    Tennessee Academic Standards for Science
Tennessee Science Standards Value Statement
Tennessee possesses a citizenry known to be intelligent, knowledgeable, hardworking, and creative.
Tennessee’s schools offer science programs that introduce a broad range of important subjects along
with opportunities to explore topics ranging from nuclear energy science to breakthrough medical
discoveries. The challenge of developing and sustaining a population of scientifically informed citizens
requires that educational systems be guided by science curriculum standards that are academically
rigorous, relevant to today’s world, and attendant to what makes Tennessee a unique place to live and
learn.
To achieve this end, school systems employ standards to craft meaningful local curricula that are
innovative and provide myriad learning opportunities that extend beyond mastery of basic scientific
principles. The Tennessee Academic Standards for Science standards include the necessary qualities and
conditions to support learning environments in which students can develop knowledge and skills needed
for post-secondary and career pursuits, and be well-positioned to become curious, lifelong learners.
Declarations:
Tennessee’s K-12 science standards are intended to guide the development and delivery of educational
experiences that prepare all students for the challenges of the 21stcentury and enable them to:
• Develop an in-depth understanding of the major science disciplines through a series of coherent K-
    12 learning experiences that afford frequent interactions with the natural and man-made worlds;
• Make pertinent connections among scientific concepts, associated mathematical principles, and
    skillful applications of reading, writing, listening, and speaking;
• Recognize that certain broad concepts/big ideas foster a comprehensive and scientifically-based
    picture of the world and are important across all fields of science;
• Explore scientific phenomena and build science knowledge and skills using their own linguistic and
    cultural experiences with appropriate assistance or accommodations;
• Identify and ask appropriate questions that can be answered through scientific investigations;
• Design and conduct investigations independently or collaboratively to generate evidence needed to
    answer a variety of questions;
• Use appropriate equipment and tools and apply safe laboratory habits and procedures;
• Think critically and logically to analyze and interpret data, draw conclusions, and develop
    explanations that are based on evidence and are free from bias;
• Communicate and defend results through multiple modes of representation (e.g., oral,
    mathematical, pictorial, graphic, and textual models);
• Integrate science, mathematics, technology, and engineering design to solve problems and guide
    everyday decisions;
• Consider trade-offs among possible solutions when making decisions about issues for which there
                                                                                                         1


     are competing alternatives;
•    Locate, evaluate, and apply reliable sources of scientific and technological information;
•    Recognize that the principal activity of scientists is to explain the natural world and develop
     associated theories and laws;
•    Recognize that current scientific understanding is tentative and subject to change as experimental
     evidence accumulates and/or old evidence is reexamined;
•    Demonstrate an understanding of scientific principles and the ability to conduct investigations
     through student-directed experiments, authentic performances, lab reports, portfolios, laboratory
     demonstrations, real world projects, interviews, and high-stakes tests. 1
1
  Information from the NSTA Position Statements was adapted to compile this document.
                                                                                                        2


Table of Contents
   Section                                                              Page Number
   Background Information and Context
            Research and Vision of the Standards                        4
            Crosscutting Concepts                                       6
            Science and Engineering Practices                           6
            Engineering Technology and Science Practice Standards (ETS) 7
            Structure of the Standards                                  8
            Elementary School Progression                               8
            Middle School Progression                                   8
            High School Progression                                     10
            Grade Level Overviews                                       10
            Shifts in Sequence                                          11
            Disciplinary Core Ideas across Grade Levels                 12
            Recommended Mathematical and Literacy Skills for Science    14
            Proficiency
            Scientific Literacy vs. Literacy                            16
   Kindergarten                                                         17
   First Grade                                                          21
   Second Grade                                                         25
   Third Grade                                                          30
   Fourth Grade                                                         35
   Fifth Grade                                                          40
   Sixth Grade                                                          45
   Seventh Grade                                                        49
   Eighth Grade                                                         53
   Biology I                                                            58
   Biology II                                                           63
   Chemistry I                                                          68
   Chemistry II                                                         73
   Earth and Space Science                                              78
   Ecology                                                              84
   Environmental Science                                                89
   Geology                                                              95
   Human Anatomy and Physiology                                         100
   Physical Science                                                     106
   Physical World Concepts                                              111
   Physics                                                              116
   Scientific Research                                                  121
                                                                                    3


Research and Vision of the Standards
The ideas driving the development of the standards are:
    • Improve the coherence of content from grade to grade.
    • Integrate disciplinary core ideas with crosscutting concepts and science and engineering
         practices.
    • Promote equity and diversity of science and engineering education for all learners.
Disciplinary Core Ideas and Components:
The Framework for K-12 Science Education describes the progression of disciplinary core ideas (DCIs) and
gives grade level end points. These core ideas and the component ideas are the structure and
organization of the Tennessee Academic Standards for Science. Focusing on a limited number of ideas,
grades K-12 will deepen content knowledge and build on learning. The progressions are designed to
build on student understanding of science with developmental appropriateness. The science and
engineering practices are integrated throughout the physical, life, and earth DCI groups shown below.
PHYSICAL SCIENCES (PS)
         PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
                 A. Structure and Properties of Matter
                 B. Chemical Processes
                 C. Nuclear Processes
         PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                 A. Forces, Fields, and Motion
                 B. Types of Interactions
                 C. Stability and Instability in Physical Systems
         PS3: Energy
                 A. Definitions of Energy
                 B. Conservation of Energy and Energy Transfer
                 C. Relationship Between Energy and Forces and Fields
                 D. Energy in Chemical Processes and Everyday Life
         PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for Information Transfer
                 A. Wave Properties: Mechanical and Electromagnetic
                 B. Electromagnetic Radiation
                 C. Information Technologies and Instrumentation
                                                                                                       4


LIFE SCIENCES (LS)
        LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
                A. Structure and Function
                B. Growth and Development of Organisms
                C. Organization for Matter and Energy Flow in Organisms
                D. Information Processing
        LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
                A. Interdependent Relationships in Ecosystems
                B. Cycles of Matter and Energy Transfer in Ecosystems
                C. Ecosystem Dynamics, Functioning, and Resilience
                D. Social Interactions and Group Behavior
        LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
                A. Inheritance of Traits
                B. Variation of Traits
        LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
                A. Evidence of Common Ancestry
                B. Natural Selection
                C. Adaptation
                D. Biodiversity and Humans
EARTH AND SPACE SCIENCES (ESS)
        ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
                A. The Universe and Its Stars
                B. Earth and the Solar System
                C. The History of Planet Earth
        ESS2: Earth’s Systems
                A. Earth Materials and Systems
                B. Plate Tectonics and Large-Scale System Interactions
                C. The Roles of Water in Earth’s Surface Processes
                D. Weather and Climate
                E. Biogeology
        ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
                A. Natural Resources
                B. Natural Hazards
                C. Human Impacts on Earth Systems
                D. Global Climate Change
                                                                        5


ENGINEERING, TECHNOLOGY, AND APPLICATIONS OF SCIENCE (ETS)
          ETS1: Engineering Design
                   A. Defining and Delimiting and Engineering Problems
                   B. Developing Possible Solutions
                   C. Optimizing the Solution Design
          ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
                   A. Interdependence of Science, Technology, Engineering, and Math (STEM)
                   B. Influence of Engineering, Technology, and Science on Society and the Natural World
          ETS3: Applications of Science
                   A. Nature of Science Components
                   B. Theory Development and Revision
                   C. Science Practices: Utilization in Developing and Conducting Original Scientific
                       Research
                   D. Practice of Peer Review
Crosscutting Concepts
These are concepts that permeate all science and show an interdependent connection among the
sciences differentiated from grades K-12. Tennessee state science standards have explicitly designed the
standard progression to include these crosscutting concepts:
     •    Pattern observation and explanation
     •    Cause and effect relationships that can be explained through a mechanism
     •    Scale, proportion, and quantity that integrate measurement and precision of language
     •    Systems and system models with defined boundaries that can be investigated and characterized
          by the next three concepts
     •    Energy and matter conservation through transformations that flow or cycle into, out of, or
          within a system
     •    Structure and function of systems and their parts
     •    Stability and change of systems
Science and Engineering Practices
The science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining knowledge with skill. The goal is to allow students to discover how scientific knowledge is
produced and how engineering solutions are developed. The following practices should not be taught in
isolation or as a separate unit, but rather differentiated at each grade level from K-12 and integrated
into all core ideas employed throughout the school year. These are not to be taught in isolation but are
embedded throughout the language of the standards.
     •    Asking questions (for science) and defining problems (for engineering) to determine what is
          known, what has yet to be satisfactorily explained, and what problems need to be solved.
                                                                                                         6


    •    Developing and using models to develop explanations for phenomena, to go beyond the
         observable and make predictions or to test designs.
    •    Planning and carrying out controlled investigations to collect data that is used to test existing
         theories and explanations, revise and develop new theories and explanations, or assess the
         effectiveness, efficiency, and durability of designs under various conditions.
    •    Analyzing and interpreting data with appropriate data presentation (graph, table, statistics,
         etc.), identifying sources of error and the degree of certainty. Data analysis is used to derive
         meaning or evaluate solutions.
    •    Using mathematics and computational thinking as tools to represent variables and their
         relationships in models, simulations, and data analysis in order to make and test predictions.
    •    Constructing explanations and designing solutions to explain phenomena or solve problems.
    •    Engaging in argument from evidence to identify strengths and weaknesses in a line of reasoning,
         to identify best explanations, to resolve problems, and to identify best solutions.
    •    Obtaining, evaluating, and communicating information from scientific texts in order to derive
         meaning, evaluate validity, and integrate information.
Engineering Technology and Science Practice Standards (ETS)
Technology is embedded within the writing of the engineering standards. While engineering is a
disciplinary core idea, it will also be taught within the context of other disciplinary core ideas.
Stakeholders recognize the importance of design and innovative solutions that can be related to the
application of scientific knowledge in our society, thereby further preparing a science, technology,
engineering, and math (STEM) literate student for their college and career. STEM integration has been
supported both as a stand-alone disciplinary core idea.
                                                                                                           7


Structure of the Standards
The organization and structure of this standards document includes:
     •   Grade Level/Course Overview: An overview that describes that specific content and themes for
         each grade level or high school course.
     •   Disciplinary Core Idea: Scientific and foundational ideas that permeate all grades and connect
         common themes that bridge scientific disciplines.
     •   Standard: Statements of what students can do to demonstrate knowledge of the conceptual
         understanding. Each performance indicator includes a specific science and engineering practice
         paired with the content knowledge and skills that students should demonstrate to meet the
         grade level or high school course standards.
Elementary School Progression
The elementary science progression is designed to capture the curiosity of children through relevant
scientific content. Children are born investigators and have surprisingly sophisticated ways of thinking
about the world. Engaging a young scientist with the practices and discipline of science is imperative in
all grades but essential in grades K-5. It is important to build progressively more complex explanations of
science and natural phenomena. Children form mental models of what science is at a young age. These
mental models can lead to misconceptions, if not confronted early and addressed with a scaffolding of
science content. It is the goal of elementary science to give background knowledge and age appropriate
interaction with science as a platform to launch into deeper scientific thinking in grades 6-12.
Middle School Progression
Integrated science is a core focus within the middle school grades, and therefore, DCIs and their
components are mixed heterogeneously throughout grades 6-8. Middle school science has a standards
shift that more appropriately reflects content with crosscutting concepts as opposed to concentrating
on topics as discrete notions in isolation. This is accomplished both within and through the grade levels
by scaffolding core ideas with fluidity, relevance, and relatedness. For example, the physical science DCIs
introduced in seventh grade are necessary for understanding the life science DCIs in seventh grade. This
in turn supports the more advanced life science DCIs in eighth grade. Middle school teachers recognize
that learning develops over time, and learning progressions must follow a clear path with appropriate
grade-level expectations.
                                                                                                          8


For Physical Sciences (PS) starting in sixth grade, students utilize the science and engineering practices to
engage in ideas of energy. Energy as a physical science concept integrates throughout ecosystems (e.g.,
populations food webs) and Earth and space science (e.g., weather and ocean circulation), which in turn
impacts ecoregions of the world. Seventh grade improves upon this understanding by applying energy to
states of matter and reactions. Fundamental concepts regarding matter allow students to understand
reactions such as photosynthesis, respiration, and biogeochemical cycles in greater depth. Additionally,
introducing matter facilitates life sciences from a molecular level beyond organismal levels.
Biomolecules introduce a molecular approach through heredity. Eighth grade builds upon these
concepts further to examine forces and motion and their relatedness to energy and matter. Physical
forces integrate through Earth and space science (e.g., plate tectonics, rock cycle), driving long term
geological changes that impact ecosystems and their inhabitants. The understanding of heredity in
seventh grade allows students to make connections through natural selection, driven by the physical
forces of earth systems in eighth grade.
For Life Sciences (LS), students model ecosystems and make connections between populations of
organisms, while focusing on the crosscutting concept of energy. Energy drives ecosystems and
populations within those ecosystems. The energy that drives weather and ocean circulation also impacts
ecosystems (e.g., biomes). Seventh grade students have a foundation of energy from sixth grade and
therefore are able to examine how a single species of those ecosystems is built from the molecule up
and can pass on traits through the process of reproduction. Eighth grade utilizes understandings from
ecosystems and heredity to examine changes in an ecosystem and species over time as it relates to
physical forces that drive Earth systems.
For Earth and Space Sciences (ESS), sixth grade students examine weather and climate with a focus on
energy and ecosystems. Seventh grade looks through the lens of matter and energy to trace
biogeochemical cycling, particularly carbon, and scaffolds from climate in sixth grade to climate change.
Eighth grade employs crosscutting concepts of cycles and patterns to focus on biogeology, especially the
rock cycle and plate tectonics. Eighth grade students apply understanding of forces and motion to an
examination of our own planetary processes and those of other celestial objects.
Grade level articulation of DCIs is important for progression; however, continuity and flow is critical for
integrated science within a grade level as well. Sixth grade students apply energy and energy transfer to
food webs and population sizes in ecosystems, heating and convective processes in weather, and
climate, natural resources, and energy production, which can then be linked with ecosystems. Seventh
grade students can more appropriately understand how matter and reactions determine cellular
structures and functions, like photosynthesis and aerobic cellular respiration or the inheritance of traits,
once they have a background in matter and reactions. The foundation of photosynthesis and respiration
at the cellular level helps students make concrete connections to biogeochemical cycling, particularly
the carbon/oxygen cycle, combustion, and changes in atmospheric conditions. Eighth grade students use
understanding of forces and motion to examine multiple concepts such as the expanding universe,
biogeological processes such as the rock cycle and plate tectonics, and the impacts of these processes to
ecosystem change and species within those ecosystems.
                                                                                                            9


High School Progression
When students enter high school, they will have experienced a broad, interdisciplinary science
education as they progressed through grades K-8. The notions defined in the K-8 science standards will
frame this experience. The high school progression will continue on this path and further embed themes
of mathematics and English language arts into the science standards. The progression of science
education in high school acknowledges and complements the cognitive development of the student.
DCIs are presented in course offerings in the Physical Sciences, Life Sciences, and Earth and Space
Sciences. There are specific science standards for biology, human anatomy and physiology, physical
science, chemistry, physics, and Earth and space science. A student’s progress through high school
science courses is particularly parallel to his or her mathematical progress. As his or her mathematical
experience and acumen develops, so too will science expectations and experiences.
Grade Level Overviews
The addition of grade level overviews outlines the core ideas for a particular grade/course. A table of
core ideas has been entered and color-coded so that within-grade/course crosscutting concepts and
practices may be observed in addition to vertical alignment and sequencing. Bolded items are taught
within a course/grade, while lightly shaded items are not.
                                                                                                         10


Shifts in Sequence
        Grade Level            Previous Standards (2009)           Current Standards (2018)
                                                                Fewer themes are covered and
                                                                focus on a progression that builds
                              There are 14 themes in each       stronger background knowledge
              K-5
                              grade level.                      and science experience through
                                                                embedded practice of science and
                                                                technology.
                              There are 14 themes covered by    Middle grades are heterogeneously
                              the end of eighth grade; they are grouped in science, but strong
                              heterogeneously grouped in        crosscutting concepts attach
              6-8
                              each grade level, but there are   scientific ideas, producing a more
                              no connecting strands or          fluid progression and deeper
                              overarching concepts.             knowledge of content.
                              Overall, life science standards
                              are often repetitive within and
                              between courses. Many
                                                                A sequence of streamlined DCIs
     High School – Life       standards lack depth, while
                                                                from grades K-8 seeks to better
          Sciences            others are evasive. The sequence
                                                                vertically align with the high school
                              requires students to take Biology
                                                                offerings. All course standards have
  1 biology credit required I for graduation, with additional
                                                                a clear focus and application as
       for graduation         options for Biology II, Human
                                                                determined by the aforementioned
                              Anatomy and Physiology,
                                                                vision.
                              Ecology, and Environmental
                              Science, among other elective
                              courses.
                              Standards are articulated for 13
   High School – Physical     courses including life sciences,
          Sciences            physical sciences, and Earth      All state science course standards
                              sciences. Sequencing requires     have been reviewed and rewritten
   1 physics or chemistry     biology and chemistry and many    to conform to concepts addressed
     credit required for      elective lab science choices to   in the frameworks.
         graduation           achieve state requirements of 3
                              lab science credits.
1 additional lab science choice of PS, LS, or ES
                                                                                                      11


                          DISCIPLINARY CORE IDEAS ACROSS GRADE
                                         LEVELS
                                ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
                                ETS1: Engineering Design
                                ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
                                ESS2: Earth's Systems
                                ESS1: Earth's Place in the Universe
                                LS4: Biological Evolution: Unity and Diversity
                                LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
                                LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
                                LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Porcesses
                                PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for Information Transfer
                                PS3: Energy
                                PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                                PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
                                                                                     3
                                           2                                                                     2
                                                                                              2
                                                         1            3              3
                                                                                                             2   2
                                           4             2
                                                                      1                       3
NUMBER OF STANDARDS
                                                                                                             2
                                                         2            2
                                                                                                                 5
                                                                                     7                       3
                                           4
                                                         4            4                       6
                                                                                                             1
                      1                    1                                                                     3
                            1              1             1
                      2                                               2              2
                            1
                                           2                                                  2
                                                         3            1
                                                                                     2
                      3     3                                                                                9   5
                                           3             1                           1
                                                         1            5
                      2
                            3                                                                 7
                      1                    3             3                           5                           3
                      3     3                                         3
                                           2             2
                                                                                                             6
                                                                                                                 5
                            2                                                        4        4
                      3                    3             3            3
                            1
                      K     1              2             3            4              5        6              7   8
                                                                GRADE LEVEL
                                                                                                                     12


                              DCI                              Grade levels
                  PS1: Matter and its Interactions             K>3>5>7
                  PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and
                                                               2>3>5>8
Physical Science interactions
       (PS)       PS3: Energy                                  1>2>3>4>6
                  PS4: Waves and their applications in
                                                               1>2>4>8
                  technologies for information transfer
                  LS1: From molecules to organisms: Structure
                                                               K>1>2>3>5>7
                  and Process
                  LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, energy and
                                                               1>2>3>4>6>7
Life Science (LS) dynamics
                  LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and variation of
                                                               K>2>5>7
                  traits
                  LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity  3>4>5>6>8
                  ESS1: Earth’s place in the Universe          1>2>3>4>5>8
Earth and Space ESS2: Earth’s Systems                          K>2>3>4>6>8
  Science (ESS)
                  ESS3: Earth and Human Activity               K>3>4>6>7>8
                  ETS1: Engineering Design                     K>1>2>3>4>5>6>8
  Engineering,
Technology, and
 Applications of ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, K>1>2>3>4>5>7
  Science (ETS)   and Science on Society and the Natural World
                                                                            13


Recommended Mathematical and Literacy Skills for Science Proficiency
As a student’s mathematical skills and experiences expand, so does his or her capacity to analyze,
describe, and predict a broader range of natural phenomena. The science standards will explicitly
develop along with and parallel to the Tennessee mathematical standards for grades K-12.
Effective communication within a scientific context requires students to apply literacy skills in reading,
vocabulary, speaking and listening, and writing. Scientific information is presented in many formats with
various tones and perspectives. Students must process and synthesize information effectively to
generate new conclusions and ideas while avoiding the pitfalls of fallacious reasoning and bias.
Reading: Students should have regular practice with complex text and academic language beyond the
textbook, such as scientific journals, popular magazines, and vetted Internet sites. Scientifically literate
students should be able to read and decode information presented in multiple formats, including charts,
tables, info graphics, and flowcharts.
Vocabulary: Understanding and applying scientific vocabulary correctly is essential to science literacy.
Scientifically literate students appropriately link technical and academic vocabulary words in the
communication of scientific phenomena.
Speaking and Listening: Scientifically literate students listen critically and engage in productive
discussions surrounding a critique of scientific evidence and the validity of resulting conclusions.
Writing: Writing in a science classroom does not mimic that of writing in an English language arts
classroom. Students in early grades should begin to employ technical writing skills to strengthen
sequencing skills, as done through the writing of procedures. In high school, students should be able to
write a report complete with introduction, methods, results, analysis, and conclusion.
                                                                                                            14


Students should be experiencing science content in a way that incorporates literacy to help build the
foundational skills of observation, explanation, and argumentation.
Students’ Responsibilities:
    •  Use scientifically focused speaking and listening skills on a daily basis.
    •  Interact with data presented in multiple ways:
            o Visually through charts, graphs, infographics, and traditional text
            o Auditorily through podcasts and multimedia production
            o Tactically through the use of traditional lab experiences and non-traditional lab
                 simulations
    •  Present data and findings in multiple ways
    •  Build an appropriate scientific academic vocabulary
Teachers’ Responsibilities:
    •  Encourage the use of science and engineering practices to guide the development of literacy
       skills in science
    •  Provide a balance of appropriate sources beyond the textbook
    •  Provide opportunities for students to engage one another in critical discussion and argument
       surrounding specific content as well as data presentation
    •  Give consistent feedback on student writing and presentation
    •  Guide student research and access to content specific information from articles and journals
       while intentionally focusing on gaps in academic vocabulary
Leaders’ Responsibilities:
    •  Support teachers in text selection, developing writing experiences, and encouraging content
       level collaboration as well as collaboration with English/Language Arts teachers
    •  Support teachers in choosing classroom activities that provide opportunities for discovery,
       inquiry, and the communication of scientific phenomena in multiple forms
                                                                                                      15


Scientific Literacy vs. Literacy
                                 16


 KINDERGARTEN: GRADE OVERVIEW
 The academic standards for Kindergarten establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
 students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job
 markets. The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic
 standards for science in Kindergarten are based on research and the National Research Council’s
 Framework for K-12 Science Education.
 The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
 well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of Kindergarten. Disciplinary core ideas for
 Kindergarten include:
    Kindergarten
    Physical Sciences (PS)     Life Sciences (LS)        Earth and Space            Engineering,
                                                         Sciences (ESS)             Technology, and
                                                                                    Applications of Science
                                                                                    (ETS)
    Matter and Its             From Molecules to         Earth’s Place in the       Engineering Design
    Interactions               Organisms: Structure      Universe
                               and Process
    Motion and Stability:      Ecosystems:               Earth’s Systems            Links Among
    Forces and Interactions    Interactions, Energy,                                Engineering,
                               and Dynamics                                         Technology, Science,
                                                                                    and Society
    Energy                     Heredity: Inheritance     Earth and Human            Applications of Science
                               and Variation of Traits   Activity
    Waves and Their            Biological Change:
    Applications in            Unity and Diversity
    Technologies for
    Information Transfer
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor
are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content
knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve
problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts
that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The
Kindergarten standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting
                                                                                                        17


concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each disciplinary core idea (PS, LS, ESS) to provide
students with a well-rounded education in science.
By the end of Kindergarten, students are introduced to matter and its interactions by constructing
experiments with solids and liquids. Students make connections and use senses by classifying
observable properties of matter and classifying living and nonliving things. Throughout the year,
Kindergarten students use their observation skills to identify weather patterns and seasons. Students
also use observations and evidence to identify the relationship between earth and human activities.
                                                                                                      18


KINDERGARTEN: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
K.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
1) Plan and conduct an investigation to describe and classify different kinds of materials including
wood, plastic, metal, cloth, and paper by their observable properties (color, texture, hardness, and
flexibility) and whether they are natural or human-made.
2) Conduct investigations to understand that matter can exist in different states (solid and liquid) and
has properties that can be observed and tested.
3) Construct an evidence-based account of how an object made of a small set of pieces (blocks, snap
cubes) can be disassembled and made into a new object.
K.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
1) Use information from observations to identify differences between plants and animals (locomotion,
obtainment of food, and take in air/gasses).
2) Recognize differences between living organisms and non-living materials and sort them into groups
by observable physical attributes.
3) Explain how humans use their five senses in making scientific findings.
K.LS3.1: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
1) Make observations to describe that young plants and animals resemble their parents.
K.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
1) Analyze and interpret weather data (precipitation, wind, temperature, cloud cover) to describe
weather patterns that occur over time (hourly, daily) using simple graphs, pictorial weather symbols,
and tools (thermometer, rain gauge).
2) Develop and use models to predict weather and identify patterns in spring, summer, autumn, and
winter.
                                                                                                        19


K.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
1) Use a model to represent the relationship between the basic needs (shelter, food, water) of
different plants and animals (including humans) and the places they live.
2) Explain the purpose of weather forecasting to prepare for, and respond to, severe weather in
Tennessee.
3) Communicate solutions that will reduce the impact from humans on land, water, air, and other living
things in the local environment.
K.ETS1: Engineering Design
1) Ask and answer questions about the scientific world and gather information using the senses.
2) Describe objects accurately by drawing and/or labeling pictures.
K.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Use appropriate tools (magnifying glass, rain gauge, basic balance scale) to make observations and
answer testable scientific questions.
                                                                                                     20


FIRST GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for first grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic standards
for science in first grade are based on research and the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12
Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of first grade. Science and engineering
practices are not to be taught in isolation but within the science content. Disciplinary core ideas for first
grade include:
 First Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)      Life Sciences (LS)         Earth and Space           Engineering,
                                                        Sciences (ESS)            Technology, and
                                                                                  Applications of Science
                                                                                  (ETS)
 Matter and Its              From Molecules to          Earth’s Place in the      Engineering Design
 Interactions                Organisms: Structure       Universe
                             and Process
 Motion and Stability:       Ecosystems:                Earth’s Systems           Links Among
 Forces and Interactions     Interactions, Energy,                                Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                         Technology, Science,
                                                                                  and Society
 Energy                      Heredity: Inheritance      Earth and Human           Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits    Activity
 Waves and Their             Biological Change:
 Applications                Unity and Diversity
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor
are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content
knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve
problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts
that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The first
grade standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
                                                                                                          21


iteratively and in combination, within each disciplinary core idea (PS, LS, ESS) to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
By the end of first grade, students encounter energy of sunlight and the effects on the earth’s surface.
First graders experiment with light investigations to determine how different materials interact with
light. Investigating plants, parts of the plant, life cycle of plants, and interdependence of plants and the
surrounding environment is an essential building block toward more complex content. Students learn
about patterns in the day and night sky, that the telescope and naked eye can identify celestial objects
in the sky, and the patterns of earth, moon, and sun.
                                                                                                           22


FIRST GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
1.PS3: Energy
1) Make observations to determine how sunlight warms Earth’s surfaces (sand, soil, rocks, and water).
1.PS4: Waves and Their Application in Technologies for Information
Transfer
1) Use a model to describe how light is required to make objects visible. Summarize how Illumination
could be from an external light source or by an object giving off its own light.
2) Determine the effect of placing objects made with different materials (transparent, translucent,
opaque, and reflective) in the path of a beam of light.
1.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
1) Recognize the structure of plants (roots, stems, leaves, flowers, fruits) and describe the function of
the parts (taking in water and air, producing food, making new plants).
2) Illustrate and summarize the life cycle of plants.
3) Analyze and interpret data from observations to describe how changes in the environment cause
plants to respond in different ways.
1.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
1) Conduct an experiment to show how plants depend on air, water, minerals from soil, and light to
grow and thrive.
2) Obtain and communicate information to classify plants by where they grow (water, land) and the
plant’s physical characteristics.
3) Recognize how plants depend on their surroundings and other living things to meet their needs in
the places they live.
                                                                                                         23


1.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
1) Use observations or models of the sun, moon, and stars to describe patterns that can be predicted.
2) Observe natural objects in the sky that can be seen from Earth with the naked eye and recognize
that a telescope, used as a tool, can provide greater detail of objects in the sky.
3) Analyze data to predict patterns between sunrise and sunset, and the change of seasons.
1.ETS1: Engineering Design
1) Solve scientific problems by asking testable questions, making short-term and long-term
observations, and gathering information.
1.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Use appropriate tools (magnifying glass, basic balance scale) to make observations and answer
testable scientific questions.
                                                                                                    24


SECOND GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for second grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic standards
for science in second grade are based on research and the National Research Council’s Framework for
K-12 Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of second grade. Disciplinary core ideas for
second grade include:
 Second Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)      Life Sciences (LS)       Earth and Space            Engineering,
                                                      Sciences (ESS)             Technology, and
                                                                                 Applications of Science
                                                                                 (ETS)
 Matter and Its              From Molecules to        Earth’s Place in the       Engineering Design
 Interactions                Organisms: Structure     Universe
                             and Process
 Motion and Stability:       Ecosystems:              Earth’s Systems            Links Among
 Forces and Interactions     Interactions, Energy,                               Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                        Technology, Science,
                                                                                 and Society
 Energy                      Heredity: Inheritance    Earth and Human            Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits  Activity
 Waves and Their             Biological Change:
 Applications in             Unity and Diversity
 Technologies for
 Information Transfer
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor
are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content
knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve
problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts
that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The second
grade standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
                                                                                                       25


iteratively and in combination, within each disciplinary core idea (PS, LS, ESS) to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
By the end of second grade, students discover forces and interactions by experimenting with different
strengths and directions of pushing and pulling and designing experiments to discover the relationship
between speed and direction of an object using force. Students discover waves and the transfer of
information by experimenting with light and sound energy. Second grade students learn life cycles and
classifications of animals and adaptations for survival. Students use textual evidence to cite ways that
the earth is changing and understand the changing surface of the Earth.
                                                                                                        26


 SECOND GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
 2.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Analyze the push or the pull that occurs when objects collide or are connected.
 2) Evaluate the effects of different strengths and directions of a push or a pull on the motion of an
 object.
 3) Recognize the effect of multiple pushes and pulls on an object's movement or non-movement.
 2.PS3: Energy
 1) Demonstrate how a stronger push or pull makes things go faster and how faster speeds during a
 collision can cause a bigger change in the shape of the colliding objects.
 2) Make observations and conduct experiments to provide evidence that friction produces heat and
 reduces or increases the motion of an object.
 2.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for Information
 Transfer
 1) Plan and conduct investigations to demonstrate the cause and effect relationship between vibrating
 materials (tuning forks, water, bells) and sound.
 2) Use tools and materials to design and build a device to understand that light and sound travel in
 waves and can send signals over a distance.
 3) Observe and demonstrate that waves move in regular patterns of motion by disturbing the surface
 of shallow and deep water.
2.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
 1) Use evidence and observations to explain that many animals use their body parts and senses in
 different ways to see, hear, grasp objects, protect themselves, move from place to place, and seek,
 find, and take in food, water, and air.
 2) Obtain and communicate information to classify animals (vertebrates-mammals, birds, amphibians,
 reptiles, fish, invertebrates-insects) based on their physical characteristics.
 3) Use simple graphical representations to show that species have unique and diverse life cycles.
                                                                                                       27


2.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
1) Develop and use models to compare how animals depend on their surroundings and other living
things to meet their needs in the places they live.
2) Predict what happens to animals when the environment changes (temperature, cutting down trees,
wildfires, pollution, salinity, drought, land preservation).
2.LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
1) Use evidence to explain that living things have physical traits inherited from parents and that
variations of these traits exist in groups of similar organisms.
2.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
1) Recognize that some of Earth’s natural processes are cyclical, while others have a beginning and an
end. Some events happen quickly, while others occur slowly over time.
2.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
1) Compare the effectiveness of multiple solutions designed to slow or prevent wind or water from
changing the shape of the land.
2) Observe and analyze how blowing wind and flowing water can move Earth materials (soil, rocks)
from one place to another, changing the shape of a landform and affecting the habitats of living things.
3) Compare simple maps of different land areas to observe the shapes and kinds of land (rock, soil,
sand) and water (river, stream, lake, pond).
4) Use information obtained from reliable sources to explain that water is found in the ocean, rivers,
streams, lakes, and ponds, and may be solid or liquid.
2.ETS1: Engineering Design
1) Define a simple problem that can be solved through the development of a new or improved object
or tool by asking questions, making observations, and gather accurate information about a situation
people want to change.
2) Develop a simple sketch, drawing, or physical model that communicates solutions to others.
                                                                                                       28


3) Recognize that to solve a problem, one may need to break the problem into parts, address each
part, and then bring the parts back together
4) Compare and contrast solutions to a design problem by using evidence to point out strengths and
weaknesses of the design.
2.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Use appropriate tools to make observations, record data, and refine design ideas.
2) Predict and explain how human life and the natural world would be different without current
technologies.
                                                                                                   29


THIRD GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for third grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic standards
for science in third grade are based on research and the National Research Council’s Framework for K-
12 Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of third grade. Disciplinary core ideas for
third grade include:
 Third Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)      Life Sciences (LS)       Earth and Space            Engineering,
                                                      Sciences (ESS)             Technology, and
                                                                                 Applications of Science
                                                                                 (ETS)
 Matter and Its              From Molecules to        Earth’s Place in the       Engineering Design
 Interactions                Organisms: Structure     Universe
                             and Process
 Motion and Stability:       Ecosystems:              Earth’s Systems            Links Among
 Forces and Interactions     Interactions, Energy,                               Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                        Technology, Science,
                                                                                 and Society
 Energy                      Heredity: Inheritance    Earth and Human            Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits  Activity
 Waves and Their             Biological Change:
 Applications in             Unity and Diversity
 Technologies for
 Information Transfer
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor
are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content
knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve
problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts
that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The third
grade standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
                                                                                                        30


iteratively and in combination, within each disciplinary core idea (PS, LS, ESS) to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
By the end of third grade, students analyze internal and external structures that function supporting
survival along with how they adapt to their environment. Students investigate the cause and effect
relationships of magnets. Students experiment with static electricity and design a device that converts
energy from one form to another. Students investigate and categorize the physical properties of
planets. Students synthesize different forms of data to predict and learn about weather patterns,
climates, different forms of water, and how different types of clouds all contribute to weather.
Students learn about natural hazards and design and test solutions to minimize the impact of these.
                                                                                                        31


THIRD GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
3.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
1) Describe the properties of solids, liquids, and gases and identify that matter is made up of particles
too small to be seen.
2) Differentiate between changes caused by heating or cooling that can be reversed and that cannot.
3) Describe and compare the physical properties of matter including color, texture, shape, length,
mass, temperature, volume, state, hardness, and flexibility.
3.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
1) Explain the cause and effect relationship of magnets.
2) Solve a problem by applying the use of the interactions between two magnets.
3.PS3: Energy
1) Recognize that energy is present when objects move; describe the effects of energy transfer from
one object to another.
2) Apply scientific ideas to design, test, and refine a device that converts electrical energy to another
form of energy, using open or closed simple circuits.
3) Evaluate how magnets cause changes in the motion and position of objects, even when the objects
are not touching the magnet.
3.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
1) Analyze the internal and external structures that aquatic and land animals and plants have to
support survival, growth, behavior, and reproduction.
3.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
1) Construct an argument to explain why some animals benefit from forming groups.
                                                                                                          32


3.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
1) Explain the cause and effect relationship between a naturally changing environment and an
organism's ability to survive.
2) Infer that plant and animal adaptations help them survive in land and aquatic biomes.
3) Explain how changes to an environment's biodiversity influence human resources.
3.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
1) Use data to categorize the planets in the solar system as inner or outer planets according to their
physical properties.
3.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
1) Explain the cycle of water on Earth.
2) Associate major cloud types (cumulus, cumulonimbus, cirrus, stratus, nimbostratus) with weather
conditions.
3) Use tables, graphs, and tools to describe precipitation, temperature, and wind (direction and speed)
to determine local weather and climate.
4) Incorporate weather data to describe major climates (polar, temperate, tropical) in different regions
of the world.
3.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
1) Explain how natural hazards (fires, landslides, earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, floods) impact
humans and the environment.
2) Design solutions to reduce the impact of natural hazards (fires, landslides, earthquakes, volcanic
eruptions, floods) on the environment.
3.ETS1: Engineering Design
1) Design a solution to a real-world problem that includes specified criteria for constraints.
2) Apply evidence or research to support a design solution.
                                                                                                       33


3.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Identify and demonstrate how technology can be used for different purposes.
                                                                               34


FOURTH GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for fourth grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic standards
for science in fourth grade are based on research and the National Research Council’s Framework for K-
12 Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of fourth grade. Disciplinary core ideas for
fourth grade include:
 Fourth Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)      Life Sciences (LS)       Earth and Space            Engineering,
                                                      Sciences (ESS)             Technology, and
                                                                                 Applications of Science
                                                                                 (ETS)
 Matter and Its              From Molecules to        Earth’s Place in the       Engineering Design
 Interactions                Organisms: Structure     Universe
                             and Process
 Motion and Stability:       Ecosystems:              Earth’s Systems            Links Among
 Forces and Interactions     Interactions, Energy,                               Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                        Technology, Science,
                                                                                 and Society
 Energy                      Heredity: Inheritance    Earth and Human            Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits  Activity
 Waves and Their             Biological Change:
 Applications in             Unity and Diversity
 Technologies for
 Information Transfer
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor
are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content
knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve
problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts
that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The fourth
grade standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
                                                                                                        35


iteratively and in combination, within each disciplinary core idea (PS, LS, ESS) to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
By the end of fourth grade, students develop an understanding how plants, animals, and nonliving
things in an ecosystem interact with each other. They analyze temporary and permanent changes
caused by weather and living things on Earth’s land and water, and they investigate how the
placements of certain landforms create a predictable pattern. Students examine various types of
energy transfer, including sound, light, heat, and electric currents, and model how energy transforms
with added speed or in a collision. They create models to explain how waves travel and how waves of
light become visible to humans.
                                                                                                        36


FOURTH GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
4.PS3: Energy
1) Use evidence to explain the cause and effect relationship between the speed of an object and the
energy of an object.
2) Observe and explain the relationship between potential energy and kinetic energy.
3) Describe how stored energy can be converted into another form for practical use.
4.PS4: Waves and their Application in Technologies for Information
Transfer
1) Use a model of a simple wave to explain regular patterns of amplitude, wavelength, and direction.
2) Describe how the colors of available light sources and the bending of light waves determine what we
see.
3) Investigate how lenses and digital devices like computers or cell phones use waves to enhance
human senses.
4.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
1) Support an argument with evidence that plants get the materials they need for growth and
reproduction chiefly through a process in which they use carbon dioxide from the air, water, and
energy from the sun to produce sugars, plant materials, and waste (oxygen); and that this process is
called photosynthesis.
2) Develop models of terrestrial and aquatic food chains to describe the movement of energy among
producers, herbivores, carnivores, omnivores, and decomposers.
3) Using information about the roles of organisms (producers, consumers, decomposers), evaluate how
those roles in food chains are interconnected in a food web, and communicate how the organisms are
continuously able to meet their needs in a stable food web.
4) Develop and use models to determine the effects of introducing a species to, or removing a species
from, an ecosystem and how either one can damage the balance of an ecosystem.
                                                                                                     37


5) Analyze and interpret data about changes (land characteristics, water distribution, temperature,
food, and other organisms) in the environment and describe what mechanisms organisms can use to
affect their ability to survive and reproduce.
4.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
1) Obtain information about what a fossil is and ways a fossil can provide information about the past.
4.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
1) Generate and support a claim with evidence that over long periods of time, erosion (weathering and
transportation) and deposition have changed landscapes and created new landforms.
2) Use a model to explain how the orbit of the Earth and sun cause observable patterns: a. day and
night; b. changes in length and direction of shadows over a day.
4.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
1) Collect and analyze data from observations to provide evidence that rocks, soils, and sediments are
broken into smaller pieces through mechanical weathering (frost wedging, abrasion, tree root wedging)
and are transported by water, ice, wind, gravity, and vegetation.
2) Interpret maps to determine that the location of mountain ranges, deep ocean trenches, volcanoes,
and earthquakes occur in patterns.
3) Provide examples to support the claim that organisms affect the physical characteristics of their
regions.
4) Analyze and interpret data on the four layers of the Earth, including thickness, composition, and
physical states of these layers.
4.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
1) Obtain and combine information to describe that energy and fuels are derived from natural
resources and that some energy and fuel sources are renewable (sunlight, wind, water) and some are
not (fossil fuels, minerals).
2) Create an argument, using evidence from research, that human activity (farming, mining, building)
can affect the land and ocean in positive and/or negative ways.
                                                                                                     38


4.ETS1: Engineering Design
1) Categorize the effectiveness of design solutions by comparing them to specified criteria for
constraints.
4.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Use appropriate tools and measurements to build a model.
2) Determine the effectiveness of multiple solutions to a design problem given the criteria and the
constraints.
3) Explain how engineers have improved existing technologies to increase their benefits, to decrease
known risks, and to meet societal demands (artificial limbs, seatbelts, cell phones).
                                                                                                     39


FIFTH GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for fifth grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic standards
for science in fifth grade are based on research and the National Research Council’s Framework for K-
12 Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of fifth grade. Disciplinary core ideas for fifth
grade include:
 Fifth Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)      Life Sciences (LS)       Earth and Space            Engineering,
                                                      Sciences (ESS)             Technology, and
                                                                                 Applications of Science
                                                                                 (ETS)
 Matter and Its              From Molecules to        Earth’s Place in the       Engineering Design
 Interactions                Organisms: Structure     Universe
                             and Process
 Motion and Stability:       Ecosystems:              Earth’s Systems            Links Among
 Forces and Interactions     Interactions, Energy,                               Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                        Technology, Science,
                                                                                 and Society
 Energy                      Heredity: Inheritance    Earth and Human            Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits  Activity
 Waves and Their             Biological Change:
 Applications in             Unity and Diversity
 Technologies for
 Information Transfer
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus
combining content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor
are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content
knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve
problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts
that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The fifth
grade standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
                                                                                                         40


iteratively and in combination, within each disciplinary core idea (PS, LS, ESS) to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
By the end of fifth grade, students explore Earth’s materials and systems. They use models and data to
investigate factors that affect climate and the cycling of water. Students investigate the distribution
and role of the Earth’s water. Students should explain the impact on earth’s resources and climate
when analyzing relationships between humans and the environment. Students examine inherited traits
and variations and how these variations lead to species survival. In physical science, they learn about
physical properties of matter and chemical reactions by discovering matter is not destroyed, only
changed. Investigating forces and motion, students focus on balanced and unbalanced forces and
explore patterns of change in physical systems along with gravitational forces.
                                                                                                        41


FIFTH GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
 5.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Analyze and interpret data from observations and measurements of the physical properties of
 matter to explain phase changes between a solid, liquid, or gas.
 2) Analyze and interpret data to show that the amount of matter is conserved even when it changes
 form, including transitions where matter seems to vanish.
 3) Design a process to measure how different variables (temperature, particle size, stirring) affect the
 rate of dissolving solids into liquids.
 4) Evaluate the results of an experiment to determine whether the mixing of two or more substances
 result in a change of properties.
 5.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Test the effects of balanced and unbalanced forces on the speed and direction of motion of objects.
 2) Make observations and measurements of an object’s motion to provide evidence that a pattern can
 be used to predict future motion.
 3) Use evidence to support that the gravitational force exerted by Earth on objects is directed toward
 the Earth’s center.
 4) Explain the cause and effect relationship of two factors (mass and distance) that affect gravity.
 5) Explain how forces can create patterns within a system (moving in one direction, shifting back and
 forth, or moving in cycles), and describe conditions that affect how fast or slowly these patterns occur.
 5.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
 1) Compare and contrast animal responses that are instinctual versus those that that are gathered
 through the senses, processed, and stored as memories to guide their actions.
                                                                                                         42


5.LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
1) Distinguish between inherited characteristics and those characteristics that result from a direct
interaction with the environment. Apply this concept by giving examples of characteristics of living
organisms that are influenced by both inheritance and the environment.
2) Provide evidence and analyze data that plants and animals have traits inherited from parents and
that variations of these traits exist in a group of similar organisms.
5.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
1) Analyze and interpret data from fossils to describe types of organisms and their environments that
existed long ago. Compare similarities and differences of those to living organisms and their
environments. Recognize that most kinds of animals (and plants) that once lived on Earth are now
extinct.
2) Use evidence to construct an explanation for how variations in characteristics among individuals
within the same species may provide advantages to these individuals in their survival and reproduction.
5.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
1) Explain that differences in the apparent brightness of the sun compared to other stars is due to their
relative distances from the Earth.
2) Research and explain the position of the Earth and the solar system within the Milky Way galaxy, and
compare the size and shape of the Milky Way to other galaxies in the universe.
3) Use data to categorize different bodies in our solar system including moons, asteroids, comets, and
meteoroids according to their physical properties and motion.
4) Explain the cause and effect relationship between the positions of the sun, earth, and moon and
resulting eclipses, position of constellations, and appearance of the moon.
5) Relate the tilt of the Earth’s axis, as it revolves around the sun, to the varying intensities of sunlight
at different latitudes. Evaluate how this causes changes in day-lengths and seasons.
6) Use tools to describe how stars and constellations appear to move from the Earth’s perspective
throughout the seasons.
7) Use evidence from the presence and location of fossils to determine the order in which rock strata
were formed.
                                                                                                            43


5.ETS1: Engineering Design
1) Research, test, re-test, and communicate a design to solve a problem.
2) Plan and carry out tests on one or more elements of a prototype in which variables are controlled
and failure points are considered to identify which elements need to be improved. Apply the results of
tests to redesign the prototype.
3) Describe how failure provides valuable information toward finding a solution.
5.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Use appropriate measuring tools, simple hand tools, and fasteners to construct a prototype of a new
or improved technology.
2) Describe how human beings have made tools and machines (X-ray cameras, microscopes, satellites,
computers) to observe and do things that they could not otherwise sense or do at all, or as quickly or
efficiently.
3) Identify how scientific discoveries lead to new and improved technologies.
                                                                                                       44


SIXTH GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for sixth grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of scientific practical experiences. The academic standards
for science in sixth grade are based on research and the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12
Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of sixth grade. Disciplinary core ideas for sixth
grade include:
 Sixth Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)      Life Sciences (LS)        Earth and Space           Engineering,
                                                       Sciences (ESS)            Technology, and
                                                                                 Applications of Science
                                                                                 (ETS)
 Matter and Its              From Molecules to         Earth’s Place in the      Engineering Design
 Interactions                Organisms: Structure      Universe
                             and Process
 Motion and Stability:       Ecosystems:               Earth’s Systems           Links Among
 Forces and Interactions     Interactions, Energy,                               Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                        Technology, Science,
                                                                                 and Society
 Energy                      Heredity: Inheritance     Earth and Human           Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits   Activity
 Waves and Their             Biological Change:
 Applications in             Unity and Diversity
 Technologies for
 Information Transfer
The standards incorporated into this grade have been streamlined for the students’ K-12 coherent
experience for a diversity of learners. The theme for sixth grade science is how energy, found in multiple
systems and scales, is driving ecosystems (populations, food chains/webs), Earth’s natural resources,
and Earth processes (oceans, weather, and climate). In turn, oceans, weather, and climate help
determine characteristics of ecosystems. A focus on science literacy is placed through the use of the
science and engineering practices. Often times, students are required to gather information from
reliable sources to construct evidenced-based arguments (e.g., 6.LS2.3). Finally, STEM integration is
supported both as a stand-alone disciplinary core idea.
                                                                                                         45


By the end of sixth grade, it is expected that students should be able to demonstrate the skills and
content knowledge emphasized in the following standards in preparation for future learning in science
and its practice.
                                                                                                     46


SIXTH GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
6.PS3: Energy
 1) Analyze the properties and compare sources of kinetic, elastic potential, gravitational potential,
 electric potential, chemical, and thermal energy.
 2) Construct a scientific explanation of the transformations between potential and kinetic energy.
 3) Analyze and interpret data to show the relationship between kinetic energy and the mass of an
 object in motion and its speed.
 4) Conduct an investigation to demonstrate the way that heat (thermal energy) moves among objects
 through radiation, conduction, or convection.
6.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
 1) Evaluate and communicate the impact of environmental variables on population size.
 2) Determine the impact of competitive, symbiotic, and predatory interactions in an ecosystem.
 3) Draw conclusions about the transfer of energy through a food web and energy pyramid in an
 ecosystem.
 4) Using evidence from climate data, draw conclusions about the patterns of abiotic and biotic factors
 in different biomes, specifically the tundra, taiga, deciduous forest, desert, grasslands, rainforest,
 marine, and freshwater ecosystems.
 5) Analyze existing evidence about the effect of a specific invasive species on native populations in
 Tennessee and design a solution to mitigate its impact.
 6) Research the ways in which an ecosystem has changed over time in response to changes in physical
 conditions, population balances, human interactions, and natural catastrophes.
 7) Compare and contrast auditory and visual methods of communication among organisms in relation
 to survival strategies of a population.
6.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
 1) Explain how changes in biodiversity would impact ecosystem stability and natural resources.
                                                                                                        47


 2) Design a possible solution for maintaining biodiversity of ecosystems while still providing necessary
 human resources without disrupting environmental equilibrium.
6.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
 1) Gather evidence to justify that oceanic convection currents are caused by the sun’s transfer of heat
 energy and differences in salt concentration leading to global water movement.
 2) Diagram convection patterns that flow due to uneven heating of the earth.
 3) Construct an explanation for how atmospheric flow, geographic features, and ocean currents affect
 the climate of a region through heat transfer.
 4) Apply scientific principles to design a method to analyze and interpret the impact of humans and
 other organisms on the hydrologic cycle.
 5) Analyze and interpret data from weather conditions, weather maps, satellites, and radar to predict
 probable local weather patterns and conditions.
 6) Explain how relationships between the movement and interactions of air masses, high and low
 pressure systems, and frontal boundaries result in weather conditions and severe storms.
6.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
 1) Differentiate between renewable and nonrenewable resources by asking questions about their
 availability and sustainability.
 2) Investigate and compare existing and developing technologies that utilize renewable and alternative
 energy resources.
 3) Assess the impacts of human activities on the biosphere including conservation, habitat
 management, species endangerment, and extinction.
6.ETS1: Engineering Design
 1) Evaluate design constraints on solutions for maintaining ecosystems and biodiversity.
 2) Design and test different solutions that impact energy transfer.
                                                                                                        48


SEVENTH GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for seventh grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of experiences for both science practices and content
knowledge. The academic standards for science in seventh grade are research-based and supported by
the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12 Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of seventh grade. Disciplinary core ideas for
seventh grade include:
 Seventh Grade
 Physical Sciences (PS)       Life Sciences (LS)         Earth and Space            Engineering,
                                                         Sciences (ESS)             Technology, and
                                                                                    Applications of Science
                                                                                    (ETS)
 Matter and Its               From Molecules to          Earth’s Place in the       Engineering Design
 Interactions                 Organisms: Structure       Universe
                              and Process
 Motion and Stability:        Ecosystems:                Earth’s Systems            Links Among
 Forces and Interactions      Interactions, Energy,                                 Engineering,
                              and Dynamics                                          Technology, Science,
                                                                                    and Society
 Energy                       Heredity: Inheritance      Earth and Human            Applications of Science
                              and Variation of Traits    Activity
 Waves and Their              Biological Change:
 Applications in              Unity and Diversity
 Technologies for
 Information Transfer
The standards incorporated into this grade have been streamlined for the students’ K-12 coherent
experience for a diversity of learners. The theme for seventh grade science is how matter and reactions
are the basis for life science, particularly the molecules that make up life (LS1) DNA/proteins, and their
hierarchy to organ systems and heredity; and biogeochemical cycles (LS2) carbon and oxygen cycling
through photosynthesis and aerobic cellular respiration. Earth and space science standards are
addressed from a perspective based on matter and reactions (atmospheric composition, combustion,
and climate change). Tennessee's state mathematics standards are integrated into the science
standards, specifically connecting proportional reasoning with whole number multiplication and
division. Special attention is given to science literacy through the use of the science and engineering
practices. Students are often required to gather information from reliable sources to construct
evidenced-based arguments (e.g., 7.LS1.6).
                                                                                                            49


By the end of seventh grade, it is expected that students should be able to demonstrate the skills and
content knowledge emphasized in the following standards in preparation for future learning in science
and its practice.
                                                                                                       50


SEVENTH GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
7.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Develop and use models to illustrate the structure of atoms, including the subatomic particles with
 their relative positions and charge.
 2) Compare and contrast elemental molecules and compound molecules.
 3) Classify matter as pure substances or mixtures based on composition.
 4) Analyze and interpret chemical reactions to determine if the total number of atoms in the reactants
 and products support the Law of Conservation of Mass.
 5) Use the periodic table as a model to analyze and interpret evidence relating to physical and
 chemical properties to identify a sample of matter.
 6) Create and interpret models of substances whose atoms represent the states of matter with respect
 to temperature and pressure.
7.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
 1) Develop and construct models that identify and explain the structure and function of major cell
 organelles as they contribute to the life activities of the cell and organism.
 2) Conduct an investigation to demonstrate how the cell membrane maintains homeostasis through
 the process of passive transport.
 3) Evaluate evidence that cells have structural similarities and differences in organisms across
 kingdoms.
 4) Diagram the hierarchical organization of multicellular organisms from cells to organism.
 5) Explain that the body is a system comprised of subsystems that maintain equilibrium and support
 life through digestion, respiration, excretion, circulation, sensation (nervous and integumentary), and
 locomotion (musculoskeletal).
 6) Develop an argument based on empirical evidence and scientific reasoning to explain how
 behavioral and structural adaptations in animals and plants affect the probability of survival and
 reproductive success.
                                                                                                        51


 7) Evaluate and communicate evidence that compares and contrasts the advantages and
 disadvantages of sexual and asexual reproduction.
 8) Construct an explanation demonstrating that the function of mitosis for multicellular organisms is
 for growth and repair through the production of genetically identical daughter cells.
 9) Construct a scientific explanation based on compiled evidence for the processes of photosynthesis,
 cellular respiration, and anaerobic respiration in the cycling of matter and flow of energy into and out
 of organisms.
7.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
 1) Develop a model to depict the cycling of matter, including carbon and oxygen, including the flow of
 energy among biotic and abiotic parts of an ecosystem.
7.LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
 1) Hypothesize that the impact of structural changes to genes (i.e., mutations) located on
 chromosomes may result in harmful, beneficial, or neutral effects to the structure and function of the
 organism.
 2) Distinguish between mitosis and meiosis and compare the resulting daughter cells.
 3) Predict the probability of individual dominant and recessive alleles to be transmitted from each
 parent to offspring during sexual reproduction and represent the phenotypic and genotypic patterns
 using ratios.
7.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
 1) Graphically represent the composition of the atmosphere as a mixture of gases and discuss the
 potential for atmospheric change.
 2) Engage in a scientific argument through graphing and translating data regarding human activity and
 climate.
7.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, and Applications of
Science
 1) Examine a problem from the medical field pertaining to biomaterials and design a solution taking
 into consideration the criteria, constraints, and relevant scientific principles of the problem that may
 limit possible solutions.
                                                                                                          52


EIGHTH GRADE: OVERVIEW
The academic standards for eighth grade establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of experiences for both science practices and content
knowledge. The academic standards for science in eighth grade are research-based and supported by
the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12 Science Education.
The academic standards herein establish the core content and practices of science and engineering, as
well as what Tennessee students need to know by the end of eighth grade. Disciplinary core ideas for
eighth grade include:
  Eighth Grade
  Physical Sciences (PS)     Life Sciences (LS)        Earth and Space           Engineering,
                                                       Sciences (ESS)            Technology, and
                                                                                 Applications of Science
                                                                                 (ETS)
  Matter and Its             From Molecules to         Earth’s Place in the      Engineering Design
  Interactions               Organisms: Structure      Universe
                             and Process
  Motion and Stability:      Ecosystems:               Earth’s Systems           Links Among
  Forces and Interactions    Interactions, Energy,                               Engineering,
                             and Dynamics                                        Technology, Science,
                                                                                 and Society
  Energy                     Heredity: Inheritance     Earth and Human           Applications of Science
                             and Variation of Traits   Activity
  Waves and Their            Biological Change:
  Applications in            Unity and Diversity
  Technologies for
  Information Transfer
The standards incorporated into this grade have been streamlined for the students’ K-12 coherent
experience for a diversity of learners. The themes for science in eighth grade are how forces and motion
drive objects in our solar systems (ESS1), move lithospheric plates (ESS2), and how nature’s driving
forces of geology (ESS2) impact ecosystems via environmental selection for a species (LS4). This content
utilizes core ideas from sixth and seventh grade; for example, using a hereditary approach in seventh
grade to examine natural selection in eighth grade. Tennessee's state mathematics standards are
integrated into the science standards, specifically forces and motion (8.PS2). Special attention is given to
science literacy through the use of the science and engineering practices. Students are often required to
gather information from reliable sources to construct evidenced-based arguments (e.g., 8.ESS2).
                                                                                                          53


By the end of eighth grade, it is expected that students should be able to demonstrate the skills and
content knowledge emphasized in the following standards in preparation for future learning in science
and its practice.
                                                                                                      54


EIGHTH GRADE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
8.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Design and conduct investigations depicting the relationship between magnetism and electricity in
 electromagnets, generators, and electrical motors, emphasizing the factors that increase or diminish
 the electric current and the magnetic field strength.
 2) Conduct an investigation to provide evidence that fields exist between objects exerting forces on
 each other even though the objects are not in contact.
 3) Create a demonstration of an object in motion and describe the position, force, and direction of the
 object.
 4) Plan and conduct an investigation to provide evidence that the change in an object’s motion
 depends on the sum of the forces on the object and the mass of the object.
 5) Evaluate and interpret that for every force exerted on an object there is an equal force exerted in
 the opposite direction.
8.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for Information
Transfer
 1) Develop and use models to represent the basic properties of waves including frequency, amplitude,
 wavelength, and speed.
 2) Compare and contrast mechanical waves and electromagnetic waves based on refraction, reflection,
 transmission, absorption, and their behavior through a vacuum and/or various media.
 3) Evaluate the role that waves play in different communication systems.
8.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
 1) Analyze and interpret data for patterns in the fossil record that document the existence, diversity,
 extinction, and change in life forms throughout Earth’s history.
 2) Construct an explanation addressing similarities and differences of the anatomical structures and
 genetic information between extinct and extant organisms using evidence of common ancestry and
 patterns between taxa.
                                                                                                         55


 3) Analyze evidence from geology, paleontology, and comparative anatomy to support that specific
 phenotypes within a population can increase the probability of survival of that species and lead to
 adaptation.
 4) Develop a scientific explanation of how natural selection plays a role in determining the survival of a
 species in a changing environment.
 5) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information about the technologies that have changed the way
 humans use artificial selection to influence the inheritance of desired traits in other organisms.
8.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
 1) Research, analyze, and communicate that the universe began with a period of rapid expansion using
 evidence from the motion of galaxies and composition of stars.
 2) Explain the role of gravity in the formation of our sun and planets. Extend this explanation to
 address gravity’s effect on the motion of celestial objects in our solar system and Earth’s ocean tides.
8.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
 1) Analyze and interpret data to support the assertion that rapid or gradual geographic changes lead to
 drastic population changes and extinction events.
 2) Evaluate data collected from seismographs to create a model of Earth's structure.
 3) Describe the relationship between the processes and forces that create igneous, sedimentary, and
 metamorphic rocks.
 4) Gather and evaluate evidence that energy from the earth’s interior drives convection cycles within
 the asthenosphere which creates changes within the lithosphere including plate movements, plate
 boundaries, and sea-floor spreading.
 5) Construct a scientific explanation using data that explains the gradual process of plate tectonics
 accounting for A) the distribution of fossils on different continents, B) the occurrence of earthquakes,
 and C) continental and ocean floor features (including mountains, volcanoes, faults, and trenches).
8.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
 1) Interpret data to explain that earth’s mineral, fossil fuel, and groundwater resources are unevenly
 distributed as a result of geologic processes.
                                                                                                          56


 2) Collect data, map, and describe patterns in the locations of volcanoes and earthquakes related to
 tectonic plate boundaries, interactions, and hotspots.
8.ETS1: Engineering Design
 1) Develop a model to generate data for ongoing testing and modification of an electromagnet, a
 generator, and a motor such that an optimal design can be achieved.
 2) Research and communicate information to describe how data from technologies (telescopes,
 spectroscopes, satellites, and space probes) provide information about objects in the solar system and
 universe.
                                                                                                      57


BIOLOGY I: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards for High School Biology I establish the content knowledge and skills for
Tennessee students in order to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job
markets. The course provides students with a wealth of experiences for both science practices and
content knowledge needed in an ever changing world. The academic standards for Biology I are
research-based, supported by the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12 Science Education,
and establish the core ideas and practices of science and engineering that will prepare students to use
scientific thinking to examine and evaluate knowledge encountered throughout their lives.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Biology I include:
     Biology I (BIO1)
     Life Sciences (LS)                                  Engineering, Technology, and Applications of
                                                         Science (ETS)
     From Molecules to Organisms: Structure and Engineering Design
     Process
           • Organic molecules
           • DNA structure and function
           • Protein synthesis
           • Protein structure and function
           • Cellular differentiation and
               coordinated functions
           • Eukaryotic cell cycle
           • Membrane transport
           • Photosynthesis and respiration
     Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and               Links Among Engineering, Technology,
     Dynamics                                            Science, and Society
           • Population dynamics                             • Molecular biotechnology applications
           • Carbon cycle                                    • Ethical debates of biotechnology use
           • Energy transfer
           • Succession
           • Biodiversity and ecosystem stability
     Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits       Applications of Science
           • Sexual reproduction
           • Phenotype determining factors
           • Pedigree analysis and predictions
     Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
           • Evidence for evolution
           • Natural selection
           • Evolutionary processes
           • Speciation
           • Global biodiversity patterns
           • Human activities that impact
               biodiversity
                                                                                                        58


Although science is a body of knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also a set of
practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The science
and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science. These practices are not
intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit
for the course. By combining content knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is
acquired and applied to solve problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are
seven crosscutting concepts that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all
science disciplines. The Biology I standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and
crosscutting concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
Tennessee's state mathematics standards are integrated into the science standards, specifically LS3.3.
Special attention is given to science literacy through the use of the science and engineering practices.
Students are required to gather information from reliable sources to construct evidenced-based
arguments. Finally, STEM integration is supported both as a stand-alone disciplinary core idea as well as
integrated into the life science core ideas. By the end of high school, it is expected that all students
should be able to demonstrate the skills and content knowledge emphasized in the following standards.
                                                                                                         59


BIOLOGY I: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
BIO1.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
 1) Compare and contrast existing models, identify patterns, and use structural and functional evidence
 to analyze the characteristics of life. Engage in argument about the designation of viruses as non-living
 based on these characteristics.
 2) Evaluate comparative models of various cell types with a focus on organic molecules that make up
 cellular structures.
 3) Integrate evidence to develop a structural model of a DNA molecule. Using the model, develop and
 communicate an explanation for how DNA serves as a template for self-replication and encodes
 biological information.
 4) Demonstrate how DNA sequence information is decoded through transcriptional and translational
 processes within the cell in order to synthesize proteins. Examine the relationship of structure and
 function of various types of RNA and the importance of this relationship in these processes.
 5) Research examples that demonstrate the functional variety of proteins and construct an argument
 based on evidence for the importance of the molecular structure to its function. Plan and carry out a
 controlled investigation to test predictions about factors, which should cause an effect on the structure
 and function of a protein.
 6) Create a model for the major events of the eukaryotic cell cycle, including mitosis. Compare and
 contrast the rates of cell division in various eukaryotic cell types in multicellular organisms.
 7) Utilize a model of a cell plasma membrane to compare the various types of cellular transport and
 test predictions about the movement of molecules into or out of a cell based on the homeostasis of
 energy and matter in cells.
 8) Create a model of photosynthesis demonstrating the net flow of matter and energy into a cell. Use
 the model to explain energy transfer from light energy into stored chemical energy in the product.
 9) Create a model of aerobic respiration demonstrating flow of matter and energy out of a cell. Use the
 model to explain energy transfer mechanisms. Compare aerobic respiration to alternative processes of
 glucose metabolism.
                                                                                                         60


BIO1.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
 1) Analyze mathematical and/or computational representations of population data that support
 explanations of factors that affect population size and carrying capacities of populations within an
 ecosystem. Examine a representative ecosystem and, based on interdependent relationships present,
 predict population size effects due to a given disturbance.
 2) Create a model tracking carbon atoms between inorganic and organic molecules in an
 ecosystem. Explain human impacts on climate based on this model.
 3) Analyze through research the cycling of matter in our biosphere and explain how biogeochemical
 cycles are critical for ecosystem function.
 4) Analyze data demonstrating the decrease in biomass observed in each successive trophic level.
 Construct an explanation considering the laws of conservation of energy and matter and represent this
 phenomenon in a mathematical model to describe the transfer of energy and matter between trophic
 levels.
 5) Analyze examples of ecological succession, identifying and explaining the order of events
 responsible for the formation of a new ecosystem in response to extreme fluctuations in environmental
 conditions or catastrophic events.
BIO1.LS3: Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits
 1) Model chromosome progression through meiosis and fertilization in order to argue how the
 processes of sexual reproduction lead to both genetic similarities and variation in diploid organisms.
 Compare and contrast the processes of sexual and asexual reproduction, identifying the advantages
 and disadvantages of each.
 2) Explain how protein formation results in phenotypic variation and discuss how changes in DNA can
 lead to somatic or germ line mutations.
 3) Through pedigree analysis, identify patterns of trait inheritance to predict family member
 genotypes. Use mathematical thinking to predict the likelihood of various types of trait transmission.
BIO1.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
 1) Evaluate scientific data collected from analysis of molecular sequences, fossil records, biogeography,
 and embryology. Identify chronological patterns of change and communicate that biological evolution
 is supported by multiple lines of empirical evidence that identify similarities inherited from a common
 ancestor (homologies).
                                                                                                        61


 2) Using a model that demonstrates the change in allele frequencies resulting in evolution of a
 population over many generations, identify causative agents of change.
 3) Identify ecosystem services and assess the role of biodiversity in support of these services. Analyze
 the role human activities have on disruption of these services.
BIO1.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
 1) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information on how molecular biotechnology may be used in a
 variety of fields.
 2) Investigate the means by which karyotypes are utilized in diagnostic medicine.
 3) Analyze scientific and ethical arguments to support the pros and cons of application of a specific
 biotechnology technique such as stem cell usage, in vitro fertilization, or genetically modified
 organisms.
                                                                                                         62


BIOLOGY II: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards for high school Biology II are built on the foundation provided by Biology I (a
prerequisite course) and are research-based, supported by the National Research Council’s Framework
for K-12 Science Education. Biology II provides students with the opportunity to focus on a particular
aspect of life science in more detail while continuing to provide knowledge that is rooted in the same
crosscutting concepts and practices utilized throughout all of the sciences. The academic standards for
Biology II focus on organism classification and evolution with in depth analysis of plants and animals.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Biology II include:
      Biology II (BIO2)
      Life Sciences (LS)                                 Engineering, Technology, and Applications of
                                                         Science (ETS)
      From Molecules to Organisms: Structure and         Engineering Design
      Process
                                                         Links Among Engineering, Technology,
                                                         Science, and Society (ETS)
      Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and                   • Microscope
      Dynamics                                                • Biotechnology support of the theory
                                                                  of evolution
                                                         Engineering and technology applications
                                                         using living organisms
      Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits      Applications of Science
      Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
           • History and classification of life
           • Plant structure, function,
               classification, and evolution
           • Animal structure, function,
               classification, and evolution
           • Animal social interactions and group
               behaviors
Although science is a body of knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also a set of
practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The science
and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science. These practices are not
intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit
for the course. By combining content knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is
acquired and applied to solve problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are
seven crosscutting concepts that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all
science disciplines. The Biology II standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and
crosscutting concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
                                                                                                         63


Special attention has been given to mathematics and literacy through the use of the science and
engineering practices described above. Students are required to use mathematics in the collection,
presentation, and analysis of data, and computational thinking is employed for complex data sets and
simulation models. Students are also required to obtain information from reliable sources, evaluate
information, and construct evidenced-based arguments. The importance of STEM integration has been
stressed by including a set of stand-alone disciplinary core ideas under Engineering, Technology, and
Applications of Science, as well as being integrated throughout other major disciplinary core ideas.
Tennessee's state mathematics standards are integrated within the Biology II standards, specifically in
the collection and analysis of quantitative data in designed investigations and less specifically in
standards throughout that incorporate data measurements and/or analysis. Literacy standards are
integrated into the Biology II standards in the development of arguments, collection and evaluation of
information, and through the use of graphs as informational texts. STEM applications are incorporated
throughout the life science core ideas presented in Biology II, when data collected with technology is
used to support and explain observations.
The skills and content knowledge emphasized in the following Biology II standards are intended to
provide a deep appreciation of the variety of life forms that have previously existed and currently exist
on Earth. Consequently, a more integrated approach to the LS4 disciplinary core idea outlined
throughout this document has been implemented, with standards LS4.1-11 focusing on bacteria,
archaea, fungi, and protists, standards LS4.12-19 on plants, and LS4.20-28 on animals. In addition, the
standards should provide opportunities to practice science, promoting the development of critical
consumers of scientific information.
                                                                                                         64


BIOLOGY II: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
BIO2.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
 1) Plan and carry out an ethology investigation of a simple organism. Gather, analyze, and present data
 in tabular and graphical formats. Draw conclusions based on data and communicate findings.
 2) Compare innate versus learned behavior. Construct an argument from evidence that shows the
 value of both types of behavior and their importance to species survival.
 3) Obtain information and construct an explanation to support or oppose an adaptive advantage of
 social behaviors.
BIO2.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
 1) Use models of viruses, prokaryotes, and eukaryotes to ask questions about characteristics of living
 things and analyze theories regarding the origin of life on Earth. Construct an argument from evidence
 supporting the idea that eukaryotes could not exist on the planet if not for prokaryotes.
 2) Using information based on the geologic time scale and history of life on Earth, look for patterns in
 changes in organisms over time and explain how these patterns support the theory of evolution.
 3) Use molecular data to construct cladograms depicting phylogenetic relationships between major
 groups of organisms.
 4) Trace changes in classification schemes over time, explaining these changes considering new
 findings and new interpretations of existing data.
 5) Construct an argument from evidence supporting the three domain classification system or
 opposing the system with a suggested alternative system.
 6) Obtain information and compare features of Bacteria and Archaea. Ask questions about the
 evolution of each group.
 7) Using models, compare how the following processes occur in major groups of bacteria: gas
 exchange; nutrient distribution; energy acquisition and use; response to internal and external stimuli;
 and, reproduction.
 8) Construct an explanation for the evolution of eukaryotes and multicellularity based on evidence
 supporting the theory of endosymbiosis. Consider examples of extant organisms (viruses, bacteria, and
 protists) that invade host cells.
                                                                                                         65


9) Using models, compare how the following processes occur in major groups of protists: gas
exchange; nutrient distribution; energy acquisition and use; response to internal and external stimuli;
and, reproduction.
10) Evaluate information regarding the diversity of protists. Use this information to analyze
evolutionary relationships among protists, fungi, plants, and animals.
11) Using models, compare how the following processes occur in major groups of fungi: gas exchange;
nutrient distribution; energy acquisition and use; response to internal and external stimuli; and,
reproduction.
12) Analyze evolutionary relationships among algae and major groups of plants. In this analysis,
consider adaptations necessary for survival in terrestrial habitats.
13) Interpret data supporting current plant classification schemes. Use a dichotomous key to identify
plants based on variations in characteristics.
14) Obtain information and ask questions about the advantages and disadvantages of the basic plant
life cycle (alternation of generations). Compare variations in this life cycle among major groups of
plants.
15) Use a model angiosperm to differentiate plant organs and the tissues from which they are made.
Use the model to explain how the plant structures: provide support; regulate gas exchange; obtain and
use energy; and, process and distribute nutrients.
16) Design and carry out an investigation examining the function of plant hormones.
17) Develop a model explaining plant tropisms at different scales (cell, tissue, organ, system). Use the
model to predict how plants will respond in various environmental conditions.
18) Create an argument from evidence regarding the importance of plant relationships including
symbiosis and co-evolutionary relationships (examples: mycorrhizae, Rhizobium, pollination, etc.).
19) Investigate the role of different plant types in ecosystem building and maintenance (examples: soil
formation, inhibition of erosion, oxygen production, carbon sequestration, habitats).
20) Create a model to distinguish animal germ layers (endoderm, mesoderm, and ectoderm) and
resulting tissue types. Use the model to make predictions regarding phylogenetic relationships among
groups of organisms with varying body plans.
21) Construct an argument for the importance of embryological development in understanding
relatedness (evolutionary relationships). As part of the argument, compare models of embryological
development of protostomes and deuterostomes.
                                                                                                        66


 22) Observe examples of organisms from major animal phyla in order to describe the diverse structures
 associated with the following functions: gas exchange; energy acquisition; nutrient processing and
 distribution; environmental responses; and reproduction.
 23) Design and carry out an investigation examining how major body systems interact to maintain
 homeostasis of nutrient, energy, water, waste, and/or temperature balance.
 24) Obtain and communicate information on how the nervous and endocrine systems in a model
 vertebrate organism coordinate body functions such as: growth and development; stimuli response
 and information transmission; and, the maintenance of homeostasis.
 25) Create a model demonstrating how the immune system functions in monitoring of and responding
 to bacterial and viral infectious diseases.
 26) Gather and analyze data on ectothermic and endothermic organisms and argue the advantages and
 disadvantages these organisms possess, considering various environments in which they live and
 various strategies for survival.
 27) Model several reproductive strategies used by example organisms and compare them to explain
 how each differentially accomplishes reproductive success. Collect information in support of the
 argument that rapidly reproducing species that produce more young are more resilient.
 28) Evaluate scientific data collected from multiple sources to trace animal evolution.
BIO2.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
 1) Research the development of the microscope and advances in microscopy technology for the
 discovery and ongoing understanding of microorganisms.
 2) Construct an explanation for how classification schemes have changed based on new evidence
 gained due to advances in biotechnology.
 3) Create a timeline depicting how humans have employed engineering and technology to maximize
 use of microorganisms, plants, and animals for various purposes. Choose one specific example and
 construct an argument supporting or opposing the use of engineering or technology in this instance.
                                                                                                     67


CHEMISTRY I: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards establish the practices and core content for all Chemistry I courses in Tennessee
high schools. The core ideas within the framework and standards are not meant to represent an equal
division of material and concepts.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Chemistry I include:
                             Physical Science (PSCI)
                             Physical Sciences (PS)
                             Matter and Its Interactions
                                 • Structure and properties of matter
                                 • Chemical reactions
                                 • Nuclear process
                             Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                                 • Forces and motion
                                 • Types of interactions
                                 • Stability and instability in physical
                                     systems
                             Energy
                                 • Definitions of energy
                                 • Conservation of energy and energy
                                     transfer
                                 • Relationship between energy and forces
                                 • Energy in chemical processes and
                                     everyday life
                             Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for
                             Information Transfer
                                 • Wave properties
                                 • Electromagnetic radiation
Students should explore these chemistry concepts and the seven core concepts (patterns; cause and
effect; scale, proportion, and quantity; systems and system models; energy and matter; structure and
function; and, stability and change) through laboratory techniques, manipulation of chemical quantities,
and problem-solving practices. Within the Chemistry I standards, scientific and engineering practices are
embedded as a means to learn about specific topics identified for the course. Engaging in these
practices with current applications will help students become scientifically literate and astute consumers
of scientific information.
Teachers, schools, and districts should use these standards to make decisions concerning the structure
and content for Chemistry I classes in Tennessee schools. All chemistry courses must allow students to
engage in problem solving, decision making, critical thinking, and applied learning. Chemistry courses
are also laboratory based and require a minimum of 30% hands-on investigation. Chemistry laboratories
                                                                                                        68


will need to be stocked with the materials and equipment necessary to complete scientific
investigations.
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Chemistry I
standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively
and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education in science.
The academic standards for Chemistry I should be the basis for the development of classroom and
course-level assessments.
                                                                                                        69


CHEMISTRY I: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
CHEM1.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Understand and be prepared to use values specific to chemical processes: the mole, molar mass,
 molarity, and percent composition.
 2) Demonstrate that atoms, and therefore mass, are conserved during a chemical reaction by
 balancing chemical equations.
 3) Perform stoichiometric calculations involving the following relationships: mole-mole; mass-mass;
 mole-mass; mole-particle; and mass-particle. Show a qualitative understanding of the phenomenon of
 percent yield, limiting, and excess reagents in a chemical reaction through pictorial and conceptual
 examples. (states of matter liquid and solid; excluding volume of gasses)
 4) Use the reactants in a chemical reaction to predict the products and identify reaction classes
 (synthesis, decomposition, combustion, single replacement, double replacement).
 5) Conduct investigations to explore and characterize the behavior of gases (pressure, volume,
 temperature), develop models to represent this behavior, and construct arguments to explain this
 behavior. Evaluate the relationship (qualitatively and quantitatively) at STP between pressure and
 volume (Boyle’s law), temperature and volume (Charles’s law), temperature and pressure (Gay-Lussac
 law), and moles and volume (Avogadro’s law), and evaluate and explain these relationships with
 respect to kinetic-molecular theory. Be able to understand, establish, and predict the relationships
 between volume, temperature, and pressure using combined gas law both qualitatively and
 quantitatively.
 6) Use the ideal gas law, PV = nRT, to algebraically evaluate the relationship among the number of
 moles, volume, pressure, and temperature for ideal gases.
 7) Analyze solutions to identify solutes and solvents, quantitatively analyze concentrations (molarity,
 percent composition, and ppm), and perform separation methods such as evaporation, distillation,
 and/or chromatography and show conceptual understanding of distillation. Construct an argument to
 justify the use of certain separation methods under different conditions.
 8) Identify acids and bases as a special class of compounds with a specific set of properties.
 9) Draw models (qualitative models such as pictures or diagrams) to demonstrate understanding of
 radioactive stability and decay. Understand and differentiate between fission and fusion reactions. Use
 models (graphs or tables) to explain the concept of half-life and its use in determining the age of
 materials (such as radiometric dating).
                                                                                                         70


 10) Compare alpha, beta, and gamma radiation in terms of mass, charge, and penetrating power.
 Identify examples of applications of different radiation types in everyday life (such as its applications in
 cancer treatment).
 11) Develop and compare historical models of the atom (from Democritus to quantum model) and
 construct arguments to show how scientific knowledge evolves over time, based on experimental
 evidence, critique, and alternative interpretations.
 12) Explain the origin and organization of the Periodic Table. Predict chemical and physical properties
 of main group elements (reactivity, number of subatomic particles, ion charge, ionization energy,
 atomic radius, and electronegativity) based on location on the periodic table. Construct an argument to
 describe how the quantum mechanical model of the atom (e.g., patterns of valence and inner
 electrons) defines periodic properties. Use the periodic table to draw Lewis dot structures and show
 understanding of orbital notations through drawing and interpreting graphical representations (i.e.,
 arrows representing electrons in an orbital).
 13) Use the periodic table and electronegativity differences of elements to predict the types of bonds
 that are formed between atoms during chemical reactions and write the names of chemical
 compounds, including polyatomic ions using the IUPAC criteria.
 14) Use Lewis dot structures and electronegativity differences to predict the polarities of simple
 molecules (linear, bent, trigonal planar, trigonal pyramidal, tetrahedral). Construct an argument to
 explain how electronegativity affects the polarity of basic chemical molecules.
 15) Investigate, describe, and mathematically determine the effect of solute concentration on vapor
 pressure using the solute’s van ’t Hoff factor on freezing point depression and boiling point elevation.
CHEM1.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Draw, identify, and contrast graphical representations of chemical bonds (ionic, covalent, and
 metallic) based on chemical formulas. Construct and communicate explanations to show that atoms
 combine by transferring or sharing electrons.
 2) Understand that intermolecular forces created by the unequal distribution of charge result in
 varying degrees of attraction between molecules. Compare and contrast the intermolecular forces
 (hydrogen bonding, dipole-dipole bonding, and London dispersion forces) within different types of
 simple substances (only those following the octet rule) and predict and explain their effect on chemical
 and physical properties of those substances using models or graphical representations.
 3) Construct a model to explain the process by which solutes dissolve in solvents, and develop an
 argument to describe how intermolecular forces affect the solubility of different chemical compounds.
                                                                                                            71


 4) Conduct an investigation to determine how temperature, surface area, and stirring affect the rate of
 solubility. Construct an argument to explain the relationships observed in experimental data using
 collision theory.
CHEM1.PS3: Energy
 1) Contrast the concepts of temperature and heat in macroscopic and microscopic terms. Understand
 that thermal energy is a form of energy and temperature is a measure of average kinetic energy of a
 group of particles.
 2) Draw and interpret heating and cooling curves and phase diagrams. Analyze the energy changes
 involved in calorimetry by using the law of conservation of energy quantitatively (use of q = mcΔT) and
 qualitatively.
 3) Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic reactions by constructing potential energy
 diagrams and explain the differences between the two using chemical terms (e.g. activation energy).
 Recognize when energy is absorbed or given off depending on the bonds formed and bonds broken.
 4) Analyze energy changes to explain and defend the law of conservation of energy.
CHEM1.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for
Information Transfer
 1) Using a model, explain why elements emit and absorb characteristic frequencies of light and how
 this information is used.
                                                                                                       72


CHEMISTRY II: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards establish the practices and core content for all Chemistry II courses in
Tennessee high schools. The core ideas within the framework and standards are not meant to represent
an equal division of material and concepts.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Chemistry II include:
                              Physical Science (PSCI)
                              Physical Sciences (PS)
                              Matter and Its Interactions
                                  • Structure and properties of matter
                                  • Chemical reactions
                                  • Nuclear process
                              Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                                  • Forces and motion
                                  • Types of interactions
                                  • Stability and instability in physical
                                      systems
                              Energy
                                  • Definitions of energy
                                  • Conservation of energy and energy
                                      transfer
                                  • Relationship between energy and forces
                                  • Energy in chemical processes and
                                      everyday life
                              Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for
                              Information Transfer
                                  • Wave properties
                                  • Electromagnetic radiation
The Chemistry II standards build on topics that were introduced in Chemistry I with increased rigor.
Students should explore these advanced chemistry concepts and the seven core concepts (patterns;
cause and effect; scale, proportion, and quantity; systems and system models; energy and matter;
structure and function; and, stability and change) through laboratory techniques, manipulation of
chemical quantities, and advanced problem-solving practices. Within the Chemistry II standards,
scientific and engineering practices are embedded as a means to learn about specific topics identified
for the course. Engaging in these practices with current applications will help students become
scientifically literate and astute consumers of scientific information.
Teachers, schools, and districts should use these standards to make decisions concerning the structure
and content for Chemistry II classes in Tennessee schools. All chemistry courses must allow students to
engage in problem solving, decision making, critical thinking, and applied learning. Chemistry courses
                                                                                                       73


are also laboratory based and require a minimum of 30% hands-on investigation. Chemistry laboratories
will need to be stocked with the materials and equipment necessary to complete scientific
investigations.
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Chemistry II
standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively
and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education in science.
The academic standards for Chemistry II should be the basis for the development of classroom and
course-level assessments.
                                                                                                        74


CHEMISTRY II: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
CHEM2.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Illustrate and explain the arrangement of electrons surrounding atoms and ions (electron
 configurations and orbital notation of a specific electron in an element) and relate the arrangement of
 electrons with observed periodic trends.
 2) Gather evidence and perform calculations to determine the composition of a compound.
 3) Compare and contrast crystalline and amorphous solids with respect to particle arrangement,
 strength of bonds, melting and boiling points, bulk density, and conductivity; provide examples of each
 type.
 4) Investigate and use mathematical representations to support Dalton’s law of partial pressures and
 to compare and contrast diffusion and effusion.
 5) Obtain data and solve combined and ideal gas law problems and stoichiometry problems at STP and
 non STP conditions to quantitatively explain the behavior of gases.
 6) Use the Van der Waal’s equation to support explanations of how real gases deviate from the ideal
 gas law.
 7) Investigate, describe, and mathematically determine the effect of solute concentration on vapor
 pressure using Raoult’s Law and of the solute’s van ’t Hoff factor on freezing point depression and
 boiling point elevation.
 8) Develop models to show how different types of polymers, such as proteins, nucleic acids, and
 starches, are formed by repetitive combinations of simple subunits by condensation and addition
 reactions and to show the diverse bonding characteristics of carbon.
 9) Evaluate different organic molecules by naming and drawing the ten simplest linear hydrocarbons
 and isomers that contain single, double, and/or triple bonds and by identifying and explaining the
 properties of functional groups.
 10) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information about how carbon’s structure and function are
 used and have influenced society.
 11) Conduct a qualitative analysis lab to determine the solubility rules. Use solubility rules to identify
 spectator ions and write net ionic equations for precipitation reactions.
                                                                                                            75


 12) Analyze oxidation and reduction reactions to identify the substances gaining and losing electrons,
 distinguish between the cathode and anode, predict reactions, and balance oxidation-reduction
 reactions in acidic or basic solutions.
 13) Investigate models and explore uses of electrochemistry (batteries and electrochemical cells).
 14) Conduct titrations with standard solutions (monoprotic and diprotic) and an appropriate indicator
 and/or a pH probe to determine the concentration of an unknown acid or base, and with a weak acid or
 weak base to determine the Ka or Kb and the pH at the equivalence point.
 15) Explain common chemical reactions, including those found in biological systems, using qualitative
 and quantitative information.
 16) Create a model of the atomic substructure including electrons, protons, neutrons, quarks, and
 gluons.
CHEM2.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Plan and conduct an investigation to compare the properties of the different types of intermolecular
 forces in pure substances and in components of a mixture.
 2) Make predictions regarding the relative magnitudes of the forces acting within collections of
 interacting molecules based on the distribution of electrons within the molecules and types of
 intermolecular forces through which the molecules interact.
 3) Investigate and use mathematical evidence to support that rates of chemical reactions are
 determined by details of the molecular collisions.
 4) Analyze data and mathematically determine rate equations.
 5) Investigate the parameters of chemical equilibria in the laboratory by A) writing and calculating
 equilibrium expressions (Kc, Kp, Ksp, Ka, Kb); B) calculating Q and determining the direction the
 reaction will proceed; and, C) calculating equilibrium concentrations given an equilibrium constant and
 starting amounts.
 6) Compare and contrast the strength and dissociation of strong and weak acids and bases by
 calculating the pH and percent ionization of a solution.
 7) Research, investigate, and mathematically explain buffer systems (characteristics and capacities
 using the Henderson-Hasselbalch equation), including those found in biological systems and polyprotic
 acids.
                                                                                                       76


CHEM2.PS3: Energy
 1) Mathematically determine the enthalpy change for a given reaction using Hess’s Law, standard
 enthalpies of formation, or a given mass of a reactant.
 2) Apply scientific principles and mathematical representations to predict if a chemical reaction is
 spontaneous using Gibb’s Free Energy, ΔG = ΔH – TΔS.
 3) Apply scientific and engineering ideas to build, evaluate, and refine a fuel cell model (e.g., graphical
 representation or as a project) with specific design constraints.
 4) Collect and use data from the synthesis or decomposition of a compound to confirm the
 conservation of matter and the law of definite proportions.
 5) Use Coulomb’s law and patterns of valence electron configurations to explain trends in ionization
 energies and reactivity of pure elements.
 6) Explain the relationships between potential energy, distance between approaching atoms, bond
 length, and bond energy using graphical representations.
 7) Investigate and explain the energy changes in biological systems (such as the combustion of sugar
 and photosynthesis) both qualitatively and quantitatively.
 8) Research pyrotechnics and use concepts in thermodynamics, stoichiometry, oxidation reduction,
 and kinetics to design and create a low intensity sparkler.
CHEM2.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for
Information Transfer
 1) Investigate and contrast the mechanism of energy changes and the appearance of absorption and
 emission spectra.
 2) Apply scientific principles and mathematical representations (C=λν and E=hν) to explain that
 spectral lines are the result of and correspond to transitions between energy levels.
                                                                                                           77


EARTH AND SPACE SCIENCE: COURSE OVERVIEW
The Earth and Space Science course examines the role of Earth’s place in the universe, the interplay of
Earth’s systems, and the interrelationships between Earth’s systems and human activity. Inherent in this
course is a look at how Earth has changed over time and the dynamics that continue to affect it. As
events have impacts on the hydrosphere, biosphere, atmosphere, and geosphere, there are also sphere-
to-sphere dynamics taking place in the short, medium, and long-term. This is a lab course, with an
emphasis on important 21st century critical thinking skills.
                                Earth and Space Science (ESS)
                                Earth and Space Sciences (ESS)
                                Earth’s Place in the Universe
                                    • The universe and its stars
                                    • Earth and the solar system
                                    • The history of planet Earth
                                Earth’s Systems
                                    • Earth materials and systems
                                    • Plate tectonics and large scale system
                                        interactions
                                    • The roles of water in Earth’s surface
                                        processes
                                    • Weather and climate
                                    • Biogeology
                                Earth and Human Activity
                                    • Natural resources
                                    • Natural hazards
                                    • Human impacts on Earth systems
                                    • Global climate change
The eight science and engineering practices describe how students should learn and demonstrate
knowledge of the content outlined in the content standards. Engaging in these practices helps students
become scientifically literate and astute consumers of scientific information. The seven core concepts
(patterns; cause and effect; scale, proportion, and quantity; systems and system models; energy and
matter; structure and function; and, stability and change) are reinforced in the appropriate context of
the core science content through hands-on instruction in the classroom.
Teachers, schools, and districts should use these standards and indicators to make decisions concerning
the structure and content of Earth and Space Science. All courses should include instruction in the
practices of science and engineering, allowing students to engage in problem solving, decision making,
critical thinking, and applied learning. All Earth and Space Science courses are laboratory courses
requiring a minimum of 30% hands-on investigation. As such, labs should be stocked with the materials
and equipment necessary to complete scientific investigations.
                                                                                                        78


Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Earth and Space
Science standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education
in science.
The academic standards and performance indicators establish the practices and core content for all
Earth and Space Science courses in Tennessee high schools. The core ideas within the standards are not
meant to represent an equal division of material and concepts. Therefore, the number of indicators per
core idea should not be expected to be equal, nor should equal numbers of performance indicators
within each standard be expected.
                                                                                                        79


EARTH AND SPACE SCIENCE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
ESS.ESS1: Earth's Place in the Universe
 1) Construct an explanation regarding the rapid expansion of the universe based on astronomical
 evidence of light spectra, motion of distant galaxies, and composition of matter in the universe.
 2) Construct a model using astronomical distances to explain the spatial relationships and physical
 interactions among planetary systems, stars, multiple-star systems, star clusters, galaxies, and galactic
 groups in the universe.
 3) Analyze and interpret data about the mass of a star to predict its composition, luminosity, and
 temperature across its life cycle, including an explanation for how and why it undergoes changes at
 each stage.
 4) Communicate scientific ideas to explain the nuclear fusion process and how elements with an
 atomic number greater than helium have been formed in stars, supernova explosions, or exposure to
 cosmic rays.
 5) Analyze and compare image data from instruments used to study deep space (e.g., visible, infrared,
 radio, refracting and reflecting telescopes, and spectrophotometer). Evaluate the strengths and
 weaknesses of the instrumentation.
 6) Recognize how advances in deep space research instrumentation over the last 30 years have led to
 new understandings of Earth’s place in the universe and how these advances have benefitted society.
 7) Analyze and interpret data to compare, contrast, and explain the characteristics of objects in the
 solar system including the sun, planets and their satellites, planetoids, asteroids, and comets.
 Characteristics include: mass, gravitational attraction, diameter, and composition.
 8) Use mathematical or computational representations to predict motions of the various kinds of
 objects in our solar system, including planets, satellites, comets, and asteroids, and the influence of
 gravity, inertia, and collisions on these motions.
 9) Evaluate the evidence for the role of gravitational force and heat production in theories about the
 origin and formation of Earth. Design a research study to confirm or refute one aspect of such
 evidence.
 10) Summarize available sources of data within the solar system which provide clues about Earth’s
 formation. Using engineering principles, design a means to gather more data.
                                                                                                         80


ESS.ESS2: Earth's Systems
 1) Given an environmental disaster, analyze its effect upon the geosphere, hydrosphere, atmosphere,
 and/or biosphere, including sphere-to-sphere interactions. Analysis should conclude with an
 identification of future research to improve our ability to predict such interactions.
 2) Construct an argument based on evidence about how global and regional climate is impacted by
 interactions among the Sun's energy output, tectonic events, ocean circulation, vegetation, and human
 activities. The argument should include discussion of a variety of time scales from sudden (volcanic ash
 clouds) to intermediate (ice ages) to long-term tectonic cycles.
 3) Communicate scientific and technical information to explain how evidence from deep probes and
 seismic waves, reconstructions of historical changes in Earth’s surface and its magnetic field, and an
 understanding of physical and chemical processes lead to a model of Earth with a hot but solid inner
 core, a liquid outer core, a solid mantle, and crust.
 4) Analyze surface features of Earth and identify and explain the geologic processes responsible for
 their formation.
 5) Develop a visual model to illustrate the formation and reformation of rocks over time including
 processes such as weathering, sedimentation, and plate movement. The model should include a
 comparison of the physical properties of various rock types, common rock-forming minerals, and
 continental rocks versus the oceanic crust.
 6) Make and defend a claim based on evidence to describe the formation and on-going availability of
 mined resources such as phosphorous, platinum, rare minerals, rare earth elements, and/or fossil fuels.
 7) Apply scientific principles regarding thermal convection and gravitational movement of dense
 materials to predict the outcomes of continued development and movement of lithospheric plates
 from their growing margins at a divergent boundary (mid-ocean ridge) to their destructive margin at a
 convergent boundary (subduction zone).
 8) Using maps and numerical data, evaluate the claims, evidence, and reasoning that forces due to
 plate tectonics cause earthquake activity, volcanic eruptions, and mountain building.
 9) Design a research study to examine an area of increasing seismic or volcanic activity and predict
 what will occur in that area over the next month, year, and decade. The description should include the
 instruments and measures to be used in the study and an explanation of their capabilities and
 limitations.
 10) Construct a model which shows the interactions between processes of the hydrologic cycle and the
 greenhouse effect.
                                                                                                        81


 11) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information about human or natural threats to Tennessee.
 12) Engage in an argument from evidence to explain the degree to which the dynamics of oceanic
 currents could contribute to at least one aspect of climate change.
 13) Use a model to predict how variations in the flow of energy through radiation, conduction, and
 convection into and out of Earth’s systems could contribute to global atmospheric processes and
 climactic effects.
 14) Using data, weather maps, and other scientific tools, predict weather conditions from an analysis of
 the movement of air masses, high and low pressure systems, and frontal boundaries.
 15) Use satellite-based image datasets to compare and explain how weather and climate patterns at
 various latitudes, elevations, and proximities to water and ocean currents are a function of heat,
 evaporation, condensation, and rotation of the planet. The comparison should also include an
 examination of the same location across various seasons or years.
 16) Design a mathematical model of Earth’s energy budget showing how the electromagnetic radiation
 from the sun in watts/ m2 is reflected, absorbed, stored, redistributed among the atmosphere, ocean,
 and land systems, and reradiated back into space. The model should provide a means to predict how
 changes in greenhouse gases could affect Earth’s temperatures.
 17) Analyze the multiple sources of energy that provide power in the state of Tennessee and compare
 them to each other and to an alternative energy source. The analysis should include their functional
 components (such as infrastructure cost, on-going costs, safety, and reliability), and their social,
 cultural, and environmental impacts (including emissions of greenhouse gases).
 18) Identify the organisms that are major drivers in the global carbon cycle and trace how greenhouse
 gases are continually moved through the carbon reservoirs and fluxes represented by the ocean, land,
 life, and atmosphere.
ESS.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
 1) Identify a geographical region or small area where energy and mineral resources are scarce and
 evaluate competing design solutions for developing, managing, and utilizing these energy and mineral
 resources based on a cost-benefit analysis.
 2) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information on how natural resource availability, natural hazard
 occurrences, and climatic changes impact individuals and society.
                                                                                                      82


3) Design, evaluate, or refine a technological solution that reduces impacts of human activities on
natural systems.
4) Analyze geoscience data and the results from global climate models to make an evidence-based
forecast of the current rate of global or regional climate change and associated future impacts to Earth
systems.
                                                                                                       83


ECOLOGY: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards for Ecology establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee students
in order to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets. The course
provides students with an opportunity to develop an understanding of interrelationships in the natural
world in addition to allowing them to analyze human impacts. The academic standards for Ecology are
research-based, supported by the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12 Science Education,
and establish the core ideas and practices of science and engineering that will prepare students to use
scientific thinking to examine and evaluate knowledge encountered throughout their lives.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Ecology include:
  Ecology (ECO)
   Life Sciences (LS)                Earth and Space Sciences (ESS)    Engineering, Technology, and
                                                                       Applications of Science (ETS)
  From Molecules to Organisms:       Earth’s Place in the Universe     Engineering Design
  Structures and Process
  Ecosystems: Interactions,          Earth’s Systems                   Link Among Engineering,
  Energy, and Dynamics                                                 Technology, Science, and
       • Interdependent                                                Society
            relationships in                                               • Interdependence of
            ecosystems                                                          science, engineering,
       • Cycles of matter and                                                   and technology
            energy transfer in                                             • Influence of
            ecosystems                                                          engineering,
       • Ecosystems dynamics,                                                   technology, and science
            functioning, and                                                    on society and the
            resilience                                                          natural world
  Heredity: Inheritance and          Earth and Human Activity          Applications of Science
  Variation of Traits                    • Natural resources
                                         • Natural hazards
                                         • Human impacts on
                                              Earth systems
                                         • Global climate change
  Biological Change: Unity and
  Diversity
       • Natural selection
       • Adaptation
       • Biodiversity and
            humans
Although science is a body of knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also a set of
practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The science
and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science. These practices are not
intended to be a sequence of steps nor or they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for
the course. By combining content knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is
                                                                                                         84


acquired and applied to solve problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are
seven crosscutting concepts that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all
science disciplines. The Ecology standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and
crosscutting concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a
well-rounded education in science.
Tennessee's state mathematics and literacy standards are integrated within the science standards.
Special attention has been given to science literacy through the use of the science and engineering
practices. Students are required to gather information from reliable sources to construct evidence-
based arguments. STEM integration is supported both as a stand-alone disciplinary core idea..
By the end of the Ecology course, it is expected that all students should be able to demonstrate the skills
and content knowledge emphasized in the following standards.
                                                                                                        85


ECOLOGY: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
ECO.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
 1) Construct explanations for patterns relating to climate, flora, and fauna found in major terrestrial
 biomes (deserts, temperate grasslands, temperate forests, tropical grasslands, tropical forests, taiga,
 and tundra).
 2) Research examples of adaptations of organisms in major marine and freshwater ecosystems.
 Develop an explanation for the formation of these adaptations and predict how the organisms would
 be affected by environmental disturbances or long-term ecological changes.
 3) Create a model of an ecosystem depicting the interrelationships among organisms with a variety of
 niches. Use the model to explain resource needs of these organisms.
 4) Compare patterns of stratification and zonation in various terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems.
 Construct an argument regarding the importance of these patterns in ecosystem diversity.
 5) Using the laws of conservation of energy, create a model of energy flow through the biosphere. Use
 the model to explain limitations in energy transfer and the need for ongoing energy input.
 6) Compare pyramids of energy, numbers, and biomass to calculate rates of productivity within food
 chains and food webs among various biomes. Using mathematics, explain the relationship between
 biomass and trophic levels.
 7) Use models to explain relationships among biogeochemical cycles (water, carbon, nitrogen,
 phosphorus).
 8) Create a diagram tracing carbon through the processes of photosynthesis and respiration. Use the
 diagram to construct an explanation for the importance of photosynthesis and respiration in the carbon
 cycle.
 9) Construct an argument from evidence regarding the importance of the microbial community in
 nutrient cycling.
 10) Plan and carry out an investigation measuring species diversity (richness and evenness) and density
 in a local ecosystem.
 11) Obtain information regarding distribution patterns (clumped, uniform, random) and make
 predictions regarding types of organisms that will exhibit each type.
                                                                                                         86


 12) Use mathematical models to construct an explanation for population growth patterns and rates
 observed in ecosystems. Account for both density-dependent and density-independent factors in your
 explanation.
 13) Analyze data regarding exponential and logistic population growth patterns. Use the data to create
 mathematical models to make predictions regarding carrying capacity.
 14) Obtain information regarding survivorship curves and reproductive strategies of various species.
 Choose one of these strategies and construct an argument regarding its effectiveness.
 15) Compare types of competition and construct an explanation for the importance of niche
 differentiation in response to competition.
 16) Use a mathematical model to examine predator-prey interactions. Based on the model, construct
 an argument regarding the importance of predators in maintaining stability of prey populations.
 17) Based on information obtained from research, construct explanations regarding mechanisms by
 which prey protect themselves from predation (including herbivory).
 18) Use models to explain the impacts of types of symbiosis on the species involved in the relationship.
 19) Carry out an investigation of stability and change within a local ecosystem. Identify signs of
 succession (primary or secondary). Based on investigation findings, make predictions regarding future
 changes in this ecosystem.
 20) Plan and carry out an investigation examining kinesis and taxis in a simple organism. Construct and
 share explanations regarding observations.
 21) Gather information regarding types of learned behaviors (fixed action patterns, imprinting,
 imitation, habituation, trial-and-error, associative learning – classical conditioning, operant
 conditioning). Ask questions regarding the importance of these behaviors in species survival.
 22) Construct an explanation for the relationship between sexual selection and sexual dimorphism.
 23) Obtain and evaluate information regarding the relationship between altruistic behavior and kin
 selection.
ECO.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
 1) Develop and revise a system for classifying organisms. Justify choice of information (morphology,
 molecular data, energy acquisition, habitat, niche, trophic level, reproduction, etc.) used in developing
 your system.
                                                                                                         87


 2) Construct an argument, citing evidence, supporting the influence of natural selection on changes in
 populations over time.
 3) Design and carry out an investigation examining the importance of animal behaviors and plant
 tropisms for survival.
 4) Engage in argument from evidence regarding the importance of coevolution in species interactions
 (competition, predation, symbiosis).
 5) Construct an explanation for the importance of keystone species in ecosystem stability.
 6) Compare resource needs of specialists versus generalists. Construct an explanation regarding the
 vulnerability of specialists when faced with ecosystem disturbances.
 7) Research and evaluate the effectiveness of strategies for maintenance of biodiversity.
ECO.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
 1) Research and evaluate the effectiveness of public lands (state parks, national parks, wildlife refuges,
 wilderness areas) in sustaining biodiversity.
 2) Construct an argument in support of protection of native species. Develop responses to anticipated
 counterarguments.
 3) Engage in argument from evidence regarding the impacts of human activity on climate change.
 Design solutions to address these impacts.
ECO.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
 1) Engage in argument from evidence regarding the impact engineering and technology have on
 biodiversity.
 2) Research and communicate information on a career in ecology. Analyze the role of engineering,
 technology, and science in that career.
                                                                                                         88


ENVIRONMENTAL SCIENCE: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards for Environmental Science establish the content knowledge and skills for
Tennessee students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job
markets. The course provides students with an opportunity to develop an understanding of
interrelationships in the natural world. In addition, it allows them to identify natural and man-made
environmental problems and design and evaluate possible solutions for these problems. The academic
standards for Environmental Science are research-based, supported by the National Research Council’s
Framework for K-12 Science Education. The standards establish the core ideas and practices of science
and engineering that will prepare students to use scientific thinking to examine and evaluate knowledge
encountered throughout their lives.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Environmental Science include:
  Environmental Science (EVSC)
   Life Sciences (LS)                   Earth and Space Sciences (ESS)     Engineering, Technology, and
                                                                           Applications of Science (ETS)
  From Molecules to Organisms:          Earth’s Place in the Universe      Engineering Design
  Structures and Process
  Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy,     Earth’s Systems                    Links Among Engineering,
  and Dynamics                                                             Technology, Science, and
                                             •   Earth materials and       Society
       •    Interdependent                       systems
            relationships in                 •   Plate tectonics and            •   Interdependence of
            ecosystems                           large scale system                 science, engineering,
       •    Cycles of matter and                 interactions                       and technology
            energy transfer in               •   The roles of water in          •   Influence of
            ecosystems                           Earth’s surface                    engineering,
       •    Ecosystems dynamics,                 processes                          technology, and
            functioning, and resilience      •   Weather and climate                science on society and
                                                                                    the natural world
  Heredity: Inheritance and             Earth and Human Activity           Applications of Science
  Variation of Traits
                                             •   Natural resources              •   Importance of science
                                             •   Natural hazards                    practices in
                                             •   Human impacts on                   understanding the
                                                 Earth systems                      natural world
                                             •   Global climate change
  Biological Change: Unity and
  Diversity
       •    Natural selection
       •    Adaptation
       •    Biodiversity and humans
Although science is a body of knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also a set of
practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The science
                                                                                                           89


and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science. These practices are not
intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit
for the course. By combining content knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is
acquired and applied to solve problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are
seven crosscutting concepts that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all
science disciplines. The Environmental Science standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating
practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide
students with a well-rounded education in science.
Tennessee's state mathematics and literacy standards are integrated within the science standards.
Special attention has been given to science literacy through the use of the science and engineering
practices. Students are required to gather information from reliable sources to construct evidence-
based arguments. STEM integration is supported both as a stand-alone disciplinary core idea, as well as
being embedded in Life and Earth and Space Sciences Core Ideas.
By the end of the Environmental Science Course, it is expected that all students should be able to
demonstrate the skills and content knowledge emphasized in the following standards.
                                                                                                       90


ENVIRONMENTAL SCIENCE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
EVSC.LS2: Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and Dynamics
 1) Using a variety of data sources, construct an explanation for the impact of climate, latitude, altitude,
 geology, and hydrology patterns on plant and animal life in various terrestrial biomes.
 2) Develop an explanation of behavioral and physical adaptations organisms have for life in aquatic
 habitats with varying chemical and physical features.
 3) Using mathematical models, support arguments regarding the effects of biotic and abiotic factors on
 carrying capacity for populations within an ecosystem.
 4) Compare and contrast production (photosynthesis, chemosynthesis) and respiratory (aerobic
 respiration, anaerobic respiration, consumption, decomposition) processes responsible for the cycling
 of matter and flow of energy through an ecosystem. Using evidence, construct an argument regarding
 the importance of homeostasis in maintaining these processes in ecosystems.
 5) Use a mathematical model to explain energy flow through an ecosystem. Using the first and second
 laws of thermodynamics, construct an explanation for: A) necessity for constant energy input; B)
 limitations on energy transfer from one trophic level to the next; and, C) limitations on number of
 trophic levels that can be supported.
 6) Evaluate the interdependence among major biogeochemical cycles (water, carbon, nitrogen,
 phosphorus) in an ecosystem and recognize the importance each cycle has in maintaining ecosystem
 stability.
 7) Examine stability and change within an ecosystem by using a model of succession (primary or
 secondary) to predict impacts of disruption on an ecosystem.
EVSC.LS4: Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
 1) Construct an explanation based on scientific evidence for mechanisms of natural selection that
 result in behavioral, anatomical, and physiological adaptations in populations.
 2) Justify claims with scientific evidence that changes in environmental conditions lead to speciation
 and extinction.
 3) Evaluate the impact of habitat fragmentation and destruction, invasive species, overharvesting,
 pollution, and climate change on biodiversity (genetic, species, and ecosystem).
                                                                                                          91


 4) Engage in argument from scientific evidence critiquing effectiveness of the Endangered Species Act.
 Give specific examples to support your argument.
EVSC.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
 1) Research the development of the theory of plate tectonics. Use the theory to construct an
 explanation for how changes in Earth’s crust cause mountain formation, volcanoes, earthquakes, and
 tsunamis. Provide evidence to support the explanation using information pertaining to plate boundary
 types (divergent, convergent, transform).
 2) Considering Earth’s position within our solar system, use a model to demonstrate the causes of day
 length, seasons, and climate.
 3) Analyze the composition of the Earth’s atmosphere. Obtain information and use graphs to observe
 patterns regarding stability and change within the Earth’s atmospheric composition (O2, N2, CO2, etc.)
 over geologic time.
 4) Differentiate weather and climate and analyze and interpret data examining naturally occurring
 patterns pertaining to each.
 5) Plan and carry out an investigation examining the chemical and physical properties of water and the
 impact of water on Earth’s topography. Analyze data and share findings.
 6) Develop a model to explain soil formation and the flow of matter in the rock cycle.
EVSC.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
 1) Research Earth’s natural resources (renewable and nonrenewable resources). Construct an
 argument from evidence supporting the claim that a particular type of resource is important for
 humans.
 2) Interpret graphical data representing global human population growth over time. Look for patterns
 within this data and construct possible explanations for the patterns. Revise the explanations as
 needed based on research.
 3) Obtain and evaluate information regarding demographics for a variety of countries. Construct an
 explanation for varying fertility rates and life expectancies between countries and throughout human
 history. Taking into account demographic transition, predict what trends are likely to occur in various
 countries over time.
 4) Gather, organize, analyze, and present data on current land use trends by humans. Based on
 analysis, predict future trends.
                                                                                                         92


5) Plan and carry out an investigation examining best management practices in water usage,
agriculture, forestry, urban/suburban development, mining, or fishing and communicate findings.
6) Use a model to make predictions regarding the impact of topsoil loss due to erosion resulting from
human activity. Design, evaluate, and revise a solution to preserve topsoil.
7) Construct an argument including claim, evidence, and scientific reasoning regarding the impact of
the Green Revolution on agricultural practices, food availability, and the environment.
8) Research information on the environmental impacts of genetically modified organisms and engage
in debate regarding pros and cons of this agricultural technology.
9) Evaluate ecosystem services provided by forests ecosystems. Construct an explanation for human
impact on these services.
10) Using scientific data, analyze effectiveness of conservation versus preservation efforts. Obtain and
communicate information on organizations involved in protecting natural resources.
11) Define problems and suggest solutions associated with using, conserving, and recycling energy and
mineral resources taking into account economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits.
12) Ask questions about technology needed to develop alternative energy sources and obtain
information from various sources to answer those questions.
13) Analyze and interpret data on the effects of land, water, and air pollution on the environment and
on human health. Propose solutions for minimizing pollution from specific sources.
14) Obtain and communicate information on environmental laws pertaining to the regulation of
pollution and on regulatory agencies. Provide a specific example of how a given business/industry
would comply with such regulations.
15) Evaluate current methods of waste management and reduction and design possible improvements.
16) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate scientific information tracing the breakdown of ozone caused
by chlorofluorocarbons and the effectiveness of efforts to address this environmental problem.
17) Using mathematics and computational thinking, analyze data linking human activity to climate
change. Design solutions to address human impacts on climate change.
18) Use mathematics to calculate ecological footprints. Develop a personal plan for reducing your
impact on the environment.
                                                                                                       93


EVSC.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and
Society
 1) Engage in argument from evidence on the role engineering and technology play in a sustainable
 human society.
 2) Research and communicate information on an environmental science career. Analyze the role of
 society, engineering, technology, and science in that career.
EVSC.ETS3: Applications of Science
 1) Plan and carry out an investigation of a local ecosystem to assess human impacts. Based on your
 findings, design and evaluate a solution to minimize impacts.
                                                                                                    94


GEOLOGY: COURSE OVERVIEW
The Geology course examines Earth’s history and changes over time, Earth’s surface features and
interior, and the processes that affect life on Earth. Also included in this course is a look at the tools
used to study the Earth, rocks, minerals, and natural resources. As Earth events have impacts on the
hydrosphere, biosphere, atmosphere, and geosphere, there are also sphere-to-sphere dynamics taking
place in the short, medium, and long-term. This is a lab course, with an emphasis on important 21st
century critical thinking skills.
      Geology (GEO)
      Earth and Space Sciences (ESS)                     Engineering, Technology, and Applications of
                                                         Science (ETS)
      Earth’s Place in the Universe                      Engineering Design
           • The history of planet Earth
      Earth’s Systems                                    Links Among Engineering, Technology,
           • Earth materials and systems                 Science, and Society
           • Plate tectonics and large scale system          • Interdependence of science,
              interactions                                       engineering, and technology
           • The roles of water in Earth’s surface           • Influence of engineering, technology,
              processes                                          and science on society and the
           • Biogeology                                          natural world
      Earth and Human Activity                           Applications of Science
           • Natural resources
           • Natural hazards
           • Human impacts on Earth systems
The eight science and engineering practices describe how students should learn and demonstrate
knowledge of the content outlined in the content standards. Engaging in these practices helps students
become scientifically literate and astute consumers of scientific information. The seven core concepts
(patterns; cause and effect; scale, proportion, and quantity; systems and system models; energy and
matter; structure and function; and, stability and change) are reinforced in the appropriate context of
the core science content through hands-on instruction in the classroom.
Teachers, schools, and districts should use these standards and indicators to make decisions concerning
the structure and content of the Geology course. All courses should include instruction in the practices
of science and engineering, allowing students to engage in problem solving, decision making, critical
thinking, and applied learning. All Geology courses are laboratory courses requiring a minimum of 30%
hands-on investigation. As such, labs should be stocked with the materials and equipment necessary to
complete scientific investigations.
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
                                                                                                           95


content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Geology
standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively
and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education in science.
The academic standards and performance indicators establish the practices and core content for all
Geology courses in Tennessee high schools. The core ideas within the standards are not meant to
represent an equal division of material and concepts. Therefore, the number of indicators per core idea
should not be expected to be equal, nor should equal numbers of performance indicators within each
standard be expected.
                                                                                                        96


GEOLOGY: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
GEO.ESS1: Earth’s Place in the Universe
1) Compare and contrast methods for constructing accounts of Earth’s formation, early history, and/or
changes in environmental conditions on Earth over time.
2) Evaluate evidence used to explain the ongoing changes in the Earth's system over geologic time due
to interactions among the solid Earth, hydrosphere, and atmosphere.
3) Evaluate the geologic evidence (including index fossils, absolute and relative dating methods,
superposition, and/or crosscutting relationships) used to infer the age of the Earth. Design a research
study to confirm or refute one aspect of such evidence.
GEO.ESS2: Earth’s Systems
1) Analyze surface features of Earth in order to identify geologic processes (including weathering,
erosion, deposition, and glaciation) that are likely to have been responsible for their formation.
2) Engage in an argument from geoscience data to assert that changes to Earth's surface can create
feedbacks that cause changes to other Earth systems.
3) Create a visual model describing the processes responsible for forming the three rock groups
(sedimentary, igneous, and metamorphic) and explaining their characteristics.
4) Classify minerals and rocks on the basis of their physical and chemical properties and the
environment in which they were formed.
5) Distinguish between the physical and chemical properties of minerals.
6) Investigate the structure and geometry of crystals.
7) Communicate scientific and technical information about how the dynamic nature of the rock cycle
accounts for the interrelationships among rock and mineral types, and describe how the total amount
of material stays the same throughout formation, weathering, sedimentation, and reformation.
8) Develop a visual model to illustrate the formation and reformation of rocks over time including
processes such as weathering, sedimentation, and plate movement. The model should include a
comparison of the physical properties of various rock types, common rock-forming minerals, and
continental rocks versus the oceanic crust.
9) Develop a model that combines the rock cycle and the carbon cycle, which explains what leads up to
and follows a major volcanic eruption and its effect on carbon storage and fluxes.
                                                                                                        97


10) Conduct research, provide a rationale, plan, and conduct an investigation of the properties of water
and its effects on Earth materials and surface processes. The rationale should take into account
processes of the hydrologic cycle, including evaporation, condensation, precipitation, surface runoff,
and groundwater percolation, infiltration, and transpiration.
11) Design a solution to a complex real-world problem caused by the dynamic nature of rivers and
streams which erode and transport sediment, change their course, and flood their banks in natural and
recurring patterns.
12) Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information about man-made and natural threats (e.g., mining,
pollution, erosion, runoff, floods, and earthquakes) to Tennessee watersheds.
13) Communicate scientific and technical information to explain how evidence from deep probes and
seismic waves, reconstructions of historical changes in Earth’s surface and its magnetic field, and an
understanding of physical and chemical processes lead to a model of Earth with a hot but solid inner
core, a liquid outer core, a solid mantle, and crust.
14) Apply scientific principles regarding thermal convection and gravitational movement of dense
materials to predict the outcomes of continued development and movement of lithospheric plates
from their growing margins at a divergent boundary (mid-ocean ridge) to their destructive margin at a
convergent boundary (subduction zone).
15) Using maps and other data types, predict how plate tectonics cause earthquake activity, volcanic
eruptions, and mountain building.
16) Analyze the effect of an earthquake upon the geosphere, hydrosphere, atmosphere, and/or
biosphere, including sphere-to-sphere interactions. Analysis should conclude with an identification of
future research to improve our ability to predict such interactions.
GEO.ESS3: Earth and Human Activity
1) Use a topographic map and a geologic map to determine an ideal location for a Tennessee
electricity-generating facility to provide solar, wind, nuclear, hydroelectric, or other
renewable/nonrenewable power.
2) Make and defend a claim based on evidence to describe the formation and future availability of
mined resources (e.g., phosphorous, platinum, and fossil fuels).
3) Evaluate the evidence and reasoning supporting claims about the impact of human activities on
groundwater quality. The evaluation should include data related to multiple factors (e.g., precipitation,
topography, porosity, and run-off).
                                                                                                       98


4) Evaluate competing design solutions for developing, managing, and utilizing energy and mineral
resources in areas where they are scarce. Compare solutions in terms of environmental impact,
sustainability, and cost.
GEO.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
1) Read, interpret, and analyze a combination of ground-based observations, satellite data, and
computer models to demonstrate the interconnectedness of the geosphere, atmosphere, hydrosphere,
and biosphere.
2) Design, build, and refine a device to reduce or eliminate the effect of weathering, erosion,
deposition, or other land-surface changes that could be used by the Army Corps of Engineers,
Tennessee Valley Authority, Department of Highways, or other agency to improve the road or water
systems in Tennessee.
3) Plan and carry out an investigation using a computer-based geographical information tool such as
Google Earth, ArcGIS, or My NASA Data to examine the impact of human activities on Earth’s surface
features.
                                                                                                    99


HUMAN ANATOMY AND PHYSIOLOGY: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards for high school Human Anatomy and Physiology are built on the foundation
provided by Biology I (a prerequisite course) and are research-based, supported by the National
Research Council’s Framework for K-12 Science Education. Human Anatomy and Physiology provides
students with the opportunity to focus on a particular aspect of life science in more detail while
continuing to provide knowledge that is rooted in the same crosscutting concepts and practices utilized
throughout all of the sciences. The academic standards for Human Anatomy and Physiology are focused
on an in depth analysis of the human organ systems and how they function to support life.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Human Anatomy and Physiology include:
      Human Anatomy and Physiology (HAP)
      Life Sciences (LS)                               Engineering, Technology, and Applications of
                                                       Science (ETS)
      From Molecules to Organisms: Structure and Engineering Design
      Process                                              • Artificial organ design considerations
           • Human body organization to
               accomplish life
           • Integumentary system
           • Skeletal system
           • Muscular system
           • Cardiovascular system
           • Immune and lymphatic systems
           • Digestive system
           • Urinary system
           • Endocrine system
           • Nervous system
           • Reproductive system
      Ecosystems: Interactions, Energy, and            Links Among Engineering, Technology,
      Dynamics                                         Science, and Society
                                                           • Technology application in disease
                                                               diagnosis and/or treatment
                                                           • Technology application to enhance
                                                               human anatomy and/or physiology
      Heredity: Inheritance and Variation of Traits    Applications of Science
      Biological Change: Unity and Diversity
Although science is a body of knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also a set of
practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The science
and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science. These practices are not
intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit
for the course. By combining content knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is
acquired and applied to solve problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are
seven crosscutting concepts that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all
science disciplines. The Human Anatomy and Physiology standards have been constructed by explicitly
                                                                                                        100


integrating practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to
provide students with a well-rounded education in science.
Special attention has been given to mathematics and literacy through the use of the science and
engineering practices described above. Students are required to use mathematics in the collection,
presentation, and analysis of data, and computational thinking is employed for complex data sets and
simulation models. Students are also required to obtain information from reliable sources, evaluate
information, and construct evidence-based arguments. The importance of STEM integration has been
stressed by including a set of stand-alone disciplinary core ideas under Engineering, Technology, and
Applications of Science, as well as being integrated throughout other major disciplinary core ideas.
Tennessee's state mathematics standards are integrated throughout the Human Anatomy and
Physiology standards that incorporate data measurements and/or analysis. Literacy standards are
integrated throughout as well when informational texts are used to gather information on anatomical
structures and functions and/or when oral or written explanations are provided for how structures
support physiological mechanisms. STEM applications are incorporated throughout the life science core
ideas, in addition to the ETS core ideas, when data collected with technology and/or technology
applications are used to support and explain observations.
The skills and content knowledge emphasized in the following Human Anatomy and Physiology
standards are intended to provide a deep appreciation for normal and abnormal human structures and
functions that support life. In addition, they should provide opportunities to practice science, promoting
the development of critical consumers of scientific information.
                                                                                                       101


HUMAN ANATOMY AND PHYSIOLOGY: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
HAP.LS1: From Molecules to Organisms: Structures and Processes
Core Idea: The human body is organized to accomplish life processes.
 1) Investigate the organization of the human body in relation to its ability to accomplish life functions
 and construct an explanation for the relationship between anatomy and physiology.
 2) Differentiate the major organ systems of the human body by their anatomy and physiology and
 engage in argument about defined boundaries due to their functional connectivity.
 3) Describe the organizational levels of the human body and observe patterns in cell types and tissue
 types across organ systems.
 4) Use a human model to differentiate the major body cavities and organs located within them.
 Describe the model using proper anatomical and directional terminology for body regions, planes, and
 cavities.
 5) Explain homeostasis and describe how it is accomplished through feedback mechanisms that utilize
 receptors and effectors.
Core Idea: The Integumentary system provides protection, temperature homeostasis, and sensation
 6) Describe the anatomical structures of the integumentary system and explain their role in the
 physiological processes of protection, temperature homeostasis, and sensation.
 7) Diagram a cross-sectional image of skin layers identifying the microscopic components and describe
 the life cycle of cells that maintain these layers.
Core Idea: The Skeletal system provides support, protection, movement, storage, and hematopoiesis.
 8) Identify major bones within the axial and appendicular divisions, describing their physiological roles
 in creating a body scaffold, internal organ protection, and anchor points for skeletal muscles
 participating in movement.
 9) Diagram microscopic bone structures, identifying regions that participate in hematopoiesis and
 storage of minerals and fat.
 10) Explain the processes of bone formation, growth, and repair.
Core Idea: Muscular systems provide movement and temperature homeostasis.
                                                                                                        102


 11) Differentiate visceral, cardiac, and skeletal muscle tissues based on anatomical criteria and their
 physiological role in the movement of body parts and/or substances.
 12) Model the gross and microscopic anatomy of skeletal muscle and a muscle fiber and use the model
 to identify and explain the roles of subcellular structures that participate in the events of muscle fiber
 contraction and heat generation.
 13) Model the anatomical connections between the skeletal system and muscular system and explain
 how they generate movement through antagonistic muscle groups.
Core Idea: The Cardiovascular system provides transport of materials for homeostatic control and
protection throughout the body.
 14) Describe, in terms of structure and function, the systemic and pulmonary paths of the
 cardiovascular system.
 15) Prepare and/or use a model of a human heart to explain systole and diastole and the heart’s
 internal and external control mechanisms involved in producing the heartbeat.
 16) Explain blood pressure in terms of systole and diastole. Describe the factors affecting blood
 pressure and blood pressure’s role in homeostasis.
 17) Examine the structure (molecular and cellular) of blood constituents and describe their function.
 18) Explain how the anatomy of the respiratory system functions to provide oxygen and carbon
 dioxide transport mechanisms between the lungs and the circulatory system, considering capillary
 structures, red blood cell structures, diffusion, and affinity.
 19) Explain the relationship between the integumentary, muscular, and circulatory systems in
 temperature homeostasis.
Core Idea: The Immune and Lymphatic systems provide protection and lipid transport.
 20) Describe the relationship between the structure and function of the lymphatic system.
 21) Differentiate between innate and adaptive immunity, identifying immune cells that play a role in
 each.
 22) Analyze ABO and Rh blood groups as a basis for blood transfusion and infant incompatibility
 reactions.
 23) Diagram the progression of lipid transport from the digestive system, through the lymphatic
 system, and into the cardiovascular circulation.
                                                                                                         103


Core Idea: The Digestive system provides for absorption of raw materials that build and fuel the
body’s cells.
 24) Model the sequential organization of the alimentary canal and its accessory organs in order to
 describe the physiological role of each.
 25) Analyze gastrointestinal wall histology and explain the anatomical architecture that supports
 efficient absorption and transport of molecules into cardiovascular or lymphatic circulation.
 26) Investigate the actions of major digestive enzymes and hormones and identify their sources.
 27) Describe the role of the hepatic portal system in coupling the digestive and cardiovascular systems.
Core Idea: The Urinary system provides for waste excretion, osmotic homeostasis, electrolyte
homeostasis, and pH homeostasis.
 28) Model the sequential organization of the male and female urinary tracts in order to describe the
 physiological role of blood filtration and waste excretion from the body.
 29) Identify the parts of a nephron and describe how they assist in homeostatic mechanisms through
 urine formation.
Core Idea: The Endocrine system, through hormones, regulates the functions of organs to support life
processes.
 30) Using a model, name and locate the major endocrine glands and identify additional organ tissues in
 the human body that produce hormones. Describe the hormones produced and their physiological
 effects on other body targets.
 31) Describe the relationship between receptors and ligands and differentiate between steroid and
 nonsteroid hormones as ligands.
 32) Explain, using examples, the mechanism of negative feedback in hormonal production and control.
Core Idea: The Nervous system, in response to stimuli, coordinates functions of other body systems to
support life processes.
 33) Anatomically distinguish between the central nervous system and the peripheral nervous system.
 Explain how their structures and locations are related to their physiological roles.
                                                                                                      104


 34) Model the cellular and subcellular structures of neurons and explain the molecular
 neurophysiology of membrane potentials and the conduction of information through synaptic
 transmission.
 35) Identify and describe the types of sensory receptors found in the human body.
 36) Compare and contrast the structures and functions of the somatic nervous system and the
 autonomic nervous system.
 37) Model the major parts of the brain and spinal cord, relating each part to its source of sensory
 information and/or its primary target of regulation.
 38) Explain the structures, functions, and limitations of the human sensory systems (senses): hearing,
 balance/proprioception, sight, touch, smell, and taste.
Core Idea: The Reproductive systems ensure the continuity of species through gametogenesis,
fertilization, and embryogenesis.
 39) Identify and describe the organs of the human male and female reproductive systems that provide
 the physiological functions of gametogenesis, fertilization, and embryogenesis.
 40) Examine the microscopic structures of the human egg and sperm and explain how their structures
 relate to their functions.
 41) Based on the secretion of hormones, identify the endocrine tissues of the reproductive system and
 describe their roles in regulation of secondary sex characteristics, the female menstrual cycle,
 pregnancy, fetal development, and parturition.
 42) Trace the major events of human development from fertilization to birth, with a focus on the
 development of organs and functional organ systems.
HAP.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and Society
 1) Research system disorders to communicate information on the known facts about the disorders and
 identify technology that has been developed to diagnose and/or treat the disorders.
                                                                                                     105


PHYSICAL SCIENCE: COURSE OVERVIEW
These academic standards establish the core content for Physical Science courses taught in Tennessee
high schools.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Physical Science include:
                               Physical Science (PSCI)
                               Physical Sciences (PS)
                               Matter and Its Interactions
                                    • Structure and properties of matter
                                    • Chemical reactions
                                    • Nuclear process
                               Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                                    • Forces and motion
                                    • Types of interactions
                                    • Stability and instability in physical
                                        systems
                               Energy
                                    • Definitions of energy
                                    • Conservation of energy and energy
                                        transfer
                                    • Relationship between energy and
                                        forces
                                    • Energy in chemical processes and
                                        everyday life
                               Waves and Their Applications in Technologies
                               for Information Transfer
                                    • Wave properties
                                    • Electromagnetic radiation
Science and engineering practices are embedded in the content standards. These practices are
established to meet the specific academic standards. Skills, such as pattern recognition, cause and
effect, experimental design, scale and proportion, systems, structure and function, and stability, should
be stressed through hands-on learning within the classroom.
Inquiry is the central action within science and engineering. The process of observation, hypothesis
testing, and refinement/application of ideas should be continually incorporated within the content of
this course and not taught in isolation. Inquiry activities should be appropriate for the students' abilities.
By using these academic standards, curriculum relating to this course should be developed by teachers,
schools, and districts. Emphasis should be placed on critical thinking, problem solving and applications,
and communication (written and verbal) of student learning. It is recommended that a minimum of 25%
                                                                                                          106


of this course be devoted to hands-on learning. Equipment and materials for completion of these
investigations should be available for implementation by small student groups.
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Physical Science
standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively
and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education in science.
These academic standards should be used for the development of classroom and course-level
assessments.
                                                                                                       107


PHYSICAL SCIENCE: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
PSCI.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Using the kinetic molecular theory and heat flow considerations, explain the changes of state for
 solids, liquids, gases, and plasma.
 2) Graphically represent and discuss the results of an investigation involving pressure, volume, and
 temperature of a gas.
 3) Construct a graphical organizer for the major classifications of matter using composition and
 separation techniques.
 4) Apply scientific principles and evidence to provide explanations about physical and chemical
 changes.
 5) Trace the development of the modern atomic theory to describe atomic particle properties and
 position.
 6) Characterize the difference between atoms of different isotopes of an element.
 7) Use the periodic table as a model to predict the relative properties of elements.
 8) Using the patterns of electrons in the outermost energy level, predict how elements may combine.
 9) Use the periodic table as a model to predict the formulas of binary ionic compounds. Explain and
 use the naming conventions for binary ionic and molecular compounds.
 10) Develop a model to illustrate the claim that atoms and mass are conserved during a chemical
 reaction (i.e., balancing chemical equations).
 11) Use models to identify chemical reactions as synthesis, decomposition, single-replacement, and
 double-replacement. Given the reactants, use these models to predict the products of those chemical
 reactions.
 12) Classify a substance as acidic, basic, or neutral by using pH tools and appropriate indicators.
 13) Research and communicate explanations on how acid rain is created and its impact on the
 ecosystem.
 14) Develop models to illustrate the changes in the composition of the nucleus of the atom and the
 energy released during the processes of fission, fusion, and radioactive decay.
                                                                                                      108


15) Communicate scientific and technical information about nuclear energy and radioactive isotopes
with respect to their impact on society.
PSCI.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
1) Use mathematical representations to show how various factors (e.g., position, time, direction of
force) affect one-dimensional kinematics parameters (distance, displacement, speed, velocity,
acceleration). Determine graphically the relationships among those one-dimensional kinematics
parameters.
2) Algebraically solve problems involving constant velocity and constant acceleration in one-dimension.
3) Use free-body diagrams to illustrate the contact and non-contact forces acting on an object.
4) Plan and conduct an investigation to gather evidence and provide a mathematical explanation about
the relationship between force, mass, and acceleration. Solve related problems using F=ma.
5) Use mathematical representations to support the claim that the total momentum of a system of
objects is conserved when there is no net force on the system.
6) Apply scientific and engineering ideas to design, evaluate, and refine a device that minimizes the
force on an object during a collision.
7) Plan and conduct an investigation to provide evidence that an electric current can produce a
magnetic field.
PSCI.PS3: Energy
1) Identify and give examples of the various forms of energy (kinetic, gravitational potential, elastic
potential) and solve mathematical problems regarding the work-energy theorem and power.
2) Plan and conduct an investigation to provide evidence that thermal energy will move as heat
between objects of two different temperatures, resulting in a more uniform energy distribution
(temperature) among the objects.
3) Design, build, and refine a device within design constraints that has a series of simple machines to
transfer energy and/or do mechanical work.
4) Collect data and present your findings regarding the law of conservation of energy and the
efficiency, mechanical advantage, and power of the refined device.
5) Investigate the relationships among kinetic, potential, and total energy within a closed system (the
law of conservation of energy).
                                                                                                        109


6) Determine the mathematical relationships among heat, mass, specific heat capacity, and
temperature change using the equation Q = mCp∆T.
7) Demonstrate Ohm's Law through the design and construction of simple series and parallel circuits.
8) Plan and conduct an experiment using a controlled chemical reaction to transfer thermal energy
and/or do mechanical work.
9) Demonstrate the impact of the starting amounts of reacting substances upon the energy released.
PSCI.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for
Information Transfer
1) Use scientific reasoning to compare and contrast the properties of transverse and longitudinal
waves and give examples of each type.
2) Design/conduct an investigation and interpret gathered data to explain how mechanical waves
transmit energy through a medium.
3) Develop and use mathematical models to represent the properties of waves including frequency,
amplitude, wavelength, and speed.
4) Describe and communicate the similarities and differences across the electromagnetic spectrum.
Research methods and devices used to measure these characteristics.
5) Research and communicate scientific explanations about how electromagnetic waves are used in
modern technology to produce, transmit, receive, and store information. Examples include: medical
imaging, cell phones, and wireless networks.
                                                                                                  110


PHYSICAL WORLD CONCEPTS: COURSE OVERVIEW
These academic standards constitute the core content for Physical World Concepts taught in Tennessee
high schools.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Physical World Concepts include:
                               Physical World Concepts (PWC)
                               Physical Sciences (PS)
                               Matter and Its Interactions
                                    • Structure and properties of matter
                                    • Nuclear process
                               Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                                    • Forces and motion
                                    • Types of interactions
                                    • Stability and instability in physical
                                        systems
                               Energy
                                    • Definitions of energy
                                    • Conservation of energy and energy
                                        transfer
                                    • Energy in chemical processes and
                                        everyday life
                               Waves and Their Applications in Technologies
                               for Information Transfer
                                    • Wave properties
                                    • Electromagnetic radiation
The goal of Physical World Concepts is to provide a strong foundation for all students taking higher level
science courses. This course ensures that students understand how the physical world functions.
Physical World Concepts uses science, engineering practices, and inquiry to challenge students to work
though scientific endeavors. The course provides the skills that accomplish the goals of critical thinking,
group dynamics, curiosity, and the ability to generate high ordered questions.
These academic standards are integrated into a hands-on lab based course. It is strongly encouraged
that 45% of the course be based on experimentation and data collection. This sets the stage for proper
laboratory methodology in future academic courses.
Students pursuing STEM as a post-secondary major will have the necessary preparation for success in
college work, through the exposure to the engineering design process and data collecting laboratory
experiments.
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
                                                                                                         111


science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Physical World
Concepts standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts,
iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education
in science.
These academic standards should be used in order to develop classroom and course-level assessments.
                                                                                                      112


PHYSICAL WORLD CONCEPTS: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
PWC.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Using the Bohr model of an atom, describe the following features and components of an atom:
 protons, neutrons, electrons, mass, number and types of particles, structure, and organization.
 2) Use the kinetic molecular theory to explain how molecular motion is related to internal energy,
 temperature, heat, phase change, and expansion and contraction.
 3) Use data collected from a calorimeter to construct a phase diagram to explain both the constant
 temperature and linearly changing segments of a graph.
 4) Describe three forms of radioactivity in terms of changes in atomic number and mass number in
 order to write balanced equations for the three forms of radioactive decay.
 5) Create a model that illustrates the difference between nuclear fission and nuclear fusion in terms of
 transmutation.
 6) Through experimental data collections, investigate the concept of half-life.
PWC.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Investigate, measure, calculate, and analyze the relationship among position, displacement, velocity,
 acceleration, and time.
 2) Explore characteristics of rectilinear motion and create distance-time graphs and velocity-time
 graphs.
 3) Explain how Newton’s first law applies to objects at rest and objects moving at a constant velocity.
 4) Using Newton’s second law, analyze the relationship among the net force acting on a body, the mass
 of the body, and the resulting acceleration though mathematical and graphical methods.
 5) Apply Newton’s third law to identify the interacting forces between two bodies.
 6) Understand that the two-dimensional movement of an object can be explained as a combination of
 its horizontal and vertical components of motion.
 7) Analyze the general relationship between net force, acceleration, and motion for an object
 undergoing uniform circular motion.
 8) Describe the nature and magnitude of frictional forces.
                                                                                                      113


 9) Quantify interactions between objects to show that the total momentum is conserved in both elastic
 collisions and inelastic collisions.
 10) Determine the impulse required to produce a change in momentum.
 11) Using the law of universal gravitation, predict how gravitational force will change when the
 distance between two masses changes or the mass of one object changes.
 12) Distinguish between mass and weight using SI units.
 13) Represent the force conditions that exist for a system in equilibrium.
 14) Through the use of force diagrams, explain why objects float or sink in terms of force and density.
 15) Experimentally investigate the buoyant force exerted on floating and submerged objects.
 16) Demonstrate the effects of Bernoulli’s principle on fluid motion.
PWC.PS3: Energy
 1) Investigate the definitions of force, work, power, kinetic energy, and potential energy.
 2) Analyze the characteristics of energy and conservation of energy including friction, gravitational
 potential energy, and kinetic energy.
 3) Compare and contrast the following ways in which energy is stored in a system: mechanical,
 electrical, chemical, and nuclear.
 4) Describe various ways in which energy is transferred from one system to another (mechanical
 contact, thermal conduction, and electromagnetic radiation).
 5) Demonstrate how or explain that energy is conserved in an isolated system even if transformations
 occur within the system (i.e., chemical to electrical, electrical to mechanical).
 6) Calculate quantitative relationships associated with the conservation of energy.
 7) Describe various ways in which matter and energy interact.
 8) Mathematically quantify the relationship among electrical potential, current, and resistance in an
 ohmic system.
 9) Relate the first law of thermodynamics as an application of the law of conservation of energy.
                                                                                                       114


 10) Analyze the relationship between energy transfer and disorder in the universe (second law of
 thermodynamics).
PWC.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for Information
Transfer
 1) Build a model of a wave that describes the following characteristics of longitudinal waves and
 transverse waves: wavelength, frequency, period, amplitude, and velocity.
 2) Quantify the relationship among the frequency, wavelength, and the speed of a wave.
 3) Compare and contrast the properties and the applications of mechanical and electromagnetic
 waves.
 4) Explain the relationship between the wavelength of light absorbed or released by an atom or
 molecule and the transfer of a discrete amount of energy.
 5) Experimentally explore the additive and subtractive properties associated with color formation.
 6) Using real world application, explain the principle of the Doppler Effect.
 7) Investigate reflection, refraction, diffraction, and interference of waves.
 8) Explain what function sound resonance has in practical form.
 9) Analyze the application of polarization.
                                                                                                    115


PHYSICS: COURSE OVERVIEW
The Physics academic standards were written to establish the core content and practices for all schools
in the state of Tennessee. The core and component ideas in the Physical Sciences section in A
Framework for K-12 Science Education: Practices, Crosscutting Concepts, and Core Ides were used to
subdivide the Physics course content into four sections:
                               Physics (PHYS)
                               Physical Sciences (PS)
                               Matter and Its Interactions
                                    • Structure and properties of matter
                                    • Chemical reactions
                                    • Nuclear process
                               Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
                                    • Forces and motion
                                    • Types of interactions
                                    • Stability and instability in physical
                                        systems
                               Energy
                                    • Definitions of energy
                                    • Conservation of energy and energy
                                        transfer
                                    • Relationship between energy and
                                        forces
                                    • Energy in chemical processes and
                                        everyday life
                               Waves and Their Applications in Technologies
                               for Information Transfer
                                    • Wave properties
                                    • Electromagnetic radiation
                                    • Information technologies and
                                        instrumentation
PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
Properties of matter give rise to fields and forces. Students should understand that there are only a few
properties of matter at a fundamental level and that these properties (charge, mass, spin) give rise to
the fields and forces that exist as we understand them.
PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
An understanding of the forces and interactions between objects is important for describing an object’s
motion and determining the stability in a system. Students should understand that forces between
objects arise from four types of interactions (gravitational, electromagnetism, and strong and weak
nuclear interactions) and that some physical systems are more stable than others.
                                                                                                       116


PS3: Energy
The concept of the transfer of energy in or out of a system can be explained and predicted. Students
should understand the conservation of energy, how it is stored and transferred, the relationship
between forces and how they are related to energy, and how we use energy in our everyday life.
PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for Information Transfer
Optics is the study of the interaction of optical photons (within the human visible range) with matter.
These standards encompass the speed of light in a vacuum and other media, as well as diffraction,
refraction, and the interference properties of light.
Throughout the Physics course, the seven crosscutting concepts should be reinforced in the appropriate
context both in the classroom and hands-on experimentation. These standards also incorporate the core
and component ideas in engineering, technology, and applications of science (cited throughout the
standards) and should be implemented in this course.
Although science is a body of content knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also
a set of practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The
science and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science, thus combining
content knowledge with skill. These practices are not intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they
intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit for the course. By combining content knowledge
with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is acquired and applied to solve problems or
advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are seven crosscutting concepts that are
fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all science disciplines. The Physics
standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively
and in combination, within each core idea to provide students with a well-rounded education in science.
These standards were written to allow students to engage in scientific reasoning, critique, creative
thinking, and applied learning through hands-on investigations.
These academic standards should be used in order to develop classroom and course-level assessments.
                                                                                                       117


PHYSICS: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
PHYS.PS1: Matter and Its Interactions
 1) Develop models to illustrate the changes in the composition of the nucleus of an atom and the
 energy released during the processes of fission, fusion, and radioactive decay.
 2) Recognize and communicate examples from everyday life that use radioactive decay processes.
 3) Investigate and evaluate the expression for calculating the percentage of a remaining atom
 (N(t)=N0e-λt) using simulated models, calculations, and/or graphical representations. Define the half-
 life (t1/2) and decay constant λ. Perform an investigation on probability and calculate half-life from
 acquired data (does not require use of actual radioactive samples).
PHYS.PS2: Motion and Stability: Forces and Interactions
 1) Investigate and evaluate the graphical and mathematical relationship (using either manual graphing
 or computers) of one-dimensional kinematic parameters (distance, displacement, speed, velocity,
 acceleration) with respect to an object's position, direction of motion, and time.
 2) Algebraically solve problems involving constant velocity and constant acceleration in one-dimension.
 3) Algebraically solve problems involving arc length, angular velocity, and angular acceleration. Relate
 quantities to tangential magnitudes of translational motion.
 4) Use free-body diagrams to illustrate the contact and non-contact forces acting on an object. Use the
 diagrams in combination with graphical or component-based vector analysis and with Newton's first
 and second laws to predict the position of the object on which the forces act in a constant net force
 scenario.
 5) Gather evidence to defend the claim of Newton's first law of motion by explaining the effect that
 balanced forces have upon objects that are stationary or are moving at constant velocity.
 6) Using experimental evidence and investigations, determine that Newton’s second law of motion
 defines force as a change in momentum, F = Δp/Δt.
 7) Plan, conduct, and analyze the results of a controlled investigation to explore the validity of
 Newton's second law of motion in a system subject to a net unbalanced force, Fnet = ma or Fnet =
 Δp/Δt.
                                                                                                        118


 8) Use examples of forces between pairs of objects involving gravitation, electrostatic, friction, and
 normal forces to explain Newton's third law.
                                                            𝑚𝑚1 𝑚𝑚2
 9) Use Newton’s law of universal gravitation, 𝑭𝑭 = 𝐺𝐺        𝒓𝒓2
                                                                    , to calculate the gravitational forces, mass,
 or distance separating two objects with mass, given the information about the other quantities.
 10) Describe and mathematically determine the electrostatic interaction between electrically charged
                                            𝑞𝑞1 𝑞𝑞2
 particles using Coulomb’s law, 𝑭𝑭𝒆𝒆 = 𝑘𝑘𝑒𝑒   𝒓𝒓2
                                                    . Compare and contrast Coulomb’s law and gravitational
 force, notably with respect to distance.
 11) Develop and apply the impulse-momentum theorem along with scientific and engineering ideas to
 design, evaluate, and refine a device that minimizes the force on an object during a collision (e.g.,
 helmet, seatbelt, parachute).
 12) Use experimental evidence to demonstrate that air resistance is a velocity dependent drag force
 that leads to terminal velocity.
 13) Develop a model to predict the range of a two-dimensional projectile based upon its starting
 height, initial velocity, and angle at which it was launched.
 14) Plan and conduct an investigation to provide evidence that a constant force perpendicular to an
 object's motion is required for uniform circular motion (F = m v2 / r).
PHYS.PS3: Energy
 1) Identify and calculate different types of energy and their transformations (thermal, kinetic,
 potential, including magnetic and electrical potential energies) from one form to another in a system.
 2) Investigate conduction, convection, and radiation as a mechanism for the transfer of thermal
 energy.
 3) Use the principle of energy conservation and mathematical representations to quantify the change
 in energy of one component of a system when the energy that flows in and out of the system and the
 change in energy of the other components is known.
 4) Assess the validity of the law of conservation of linear momentum (p=mv) by planning and
 constructing a controlled scientific investigation involving two objects moving in one-dimension.
 5) Construct an argument based on qualitative and quantitative evidence that relates the change in
 temperature of a substance to its mass and heat energy added or removed from a system.
                                                                                                                119


 6) Define power and solve problems involving the rate of energy production or consumption (P =
 ΔE/Δt). Explain and predict changes in power consumption based on changes in energy demand or
 elapsed time. Investigate power consumption and power production systems in common use.
 7) Investigate and evaluate the laws of thermodynamics and use them to describe internal energy,
 heat, and work.
 8) Communicate scientific ideas to describe how forces at a distance are explained by fields
 (gravitational, electric, and magnetic) permeating space. Explain how energy is contained within the
 field and how the energy changes when the objects generating and interacting with the field change
 their relative positions.
 9) Describe, compare, and diagrammatically represent both electric and magnetic fields. Qualitatively
 predict the motion of a charged particle in each type of field, but avoid situations where the two types
 of fields are combined in the same region of space. Restrict magnetic fields to those that are parallel or
 perpendicular to the path of a charged particle.
 10) Develop a model (sketch, CAD drawing, etc.) of a resistor circuit or capacitor circuit and use it to
 illustrate the behavior of electrons, electrical charge, and energy transfer.
 11) Investigate Ohm’s law (I=V/R) by conducting an experiment to determine the relationships
 between current and voltage, current and resistance, and voltage and resistance.
 12) Apply the law of conservation of energy and charge to assess the validity of Kirchhoff’s loop and
 junction rules when algebraically solving problems involving multi-loop circuits.
 13) Predict the energy stored by a capacitor and how charge flows among capacitors connected in
 series or parallel.
 14) Recognize and communicate information about energy efficiency and/or inefficiency of machines
 used in everyday life.
 15) Compare and contrast the process, design, and performance of numerous next-generation energy
 sources (hydropower, wind power, solar power, geothermal power, biomass power, etc.).
PHYS.PS4: Waves and Their Applications in Technologies for
Information Transfer
 1) Know wave parameters (i.e., velocity, period, amplitude, frequency, angular frequency) as well as
 how these quantities are defined in the cases of longitudinal and transverse waves.
 2) Describe parameters of a medium that affect the propagation of a sound wave through it.
                                                                                                          120


3) Understand that the reflection, refraction, and transmission of waves at an interface between two
media can be modeled on the basis of characteristics of specific wave parameters and parameters of
the medium.
4) Communicate scientific and technical information about how the principle of superposition explains
the resonance and harmonic phenomena in air columns and on strings and common sound devices.
5) Evaluate the characteristics of the electromagnetic spectrum by communicating the similarities and
differences among the different bands. Research and determine methods and devices used to measure
these characteristics.
6) Plan and conduct controlled scientific investigations to construct explanations of light's behavior
(reflection, refraction, transmission, interference) including the use of ray diagrams.
7) Evaluate the claims, evidence, and reasoning behind the idea that electromagnetic radiation can be
described either by a wave model or a particle model.
8) Obtain information to construct explanations on how waves are used to produce, transmit, and
capture signals and store and interpret information.
9) Investigate how information is carried in optical systems and use Snell’s law to describe the
properties of optical fibers.
                                                                                                       121


SCIENTIFIC RESEARCH: COURSE OVERVIEW
The academic standards for Scientific Research establish the content knowledge and skills for Tennessee
students necessary to prepare them for the rigorous levels of higher education and future job markets.
The course provides students with a wealth of experiences for both science practices and content
knowledge needed in an ever changing 21st century. The academic standards for Scientific Research are
research-based, are supported by the National Research Council’s Framework for K-12 Science
Education, and establish the core ideas and practices of science and engineering that prepare students
to use scientific thinking to examine and evaluate knowledge encountered throughout their lives.
The major disciplinary core ideas utilized for Scientific Research include:
                                    Scientific Research (SCRE)
                                    Engineering, Technology, and
                                    Applications of Science (ETS)
                                    Engineering Design
                                    Links Among Engineering,
                                    Technology, Science, and Society
                                        • Interdependence of science,
                                             engineering, and technology
                                        • Influence of engineering,
                                             technology, and science on
                                             society and the natural
                                             world
                                    Applications of Science
                                        • Nature of science
                                             components
                                        • Theory development and
                                             revision
                                        • Science practices utilized in
                                             developing and conducting
                                             original scientific research
                                        • Practice of peer review
                                        • Communicating scientific
                                             findings
Although science is a body of knowledge consisting of theories that explain data, science is also a set of
practices that use analysis and argumentation to establish, extend, and refine knowledge. The science
and engineering practices are used as a means to learn science by doing science. These practices are not
intended to be a sequence of steps nor are they intended to be taught as a separate, introductory unit
for the course. By combining content knowledge with skill, students discover how scientific knowledge is
acquired and applied to solve problems or advance scientific knowledge further. In addition, there are
seven crosscutting concepts that are fundamental to the nature of science and thus stretch across all
science disciplines. The Scientific Research standards have been constructed by explicitly integrating
                                                                                                        122


practices and crosscutting concepts, iteratively and in combination, within each core idea to provide
students with a well-rounded education in science.
Tennessee's state mathematics and literacy standards are integrated within the science standards.
Special attention has been given to science literacy through the use of the science and engineering
practices. Students are required to gather information from reliable sources to construct evidence-
based arguments. STEM integration is supported throughout the Scientific Research standards.
By the end of the Scientific Research Course, it is expected that all students should be able to
demonstrate the skills and content knowledge emphasized in the following standards.
                                                                                                      123


SCIENTIFIC RESEARCH: ACADEMIC STANDARDS
SCRE.ETS2: Links Among Engineering, Technology, Science, and
Society
 1) Explore the impact of technology on social, political, or economic systems.
 2) Describe the dynamic interplay among engineering, technology, and applied science.
 3) Identify the most appropriate scientific instruments and/or computer programs for different
 experiments and research, and learn to use, care for, and maintain them, gather data, and analyze
 results.
 4) Engage in evidence-based arguments through the scientific method of investigation to understand
 the effective role that scientific discoveries played in the progression of humankind.
SCRE.ETS3: Applications of Science
 1) Research and present information about the history of the development of a scientific theory.
 Articulate reasons for refinements and/or replacement of this theory over time.
 2) Engage in argument from evidence supporting the statement that science is tentative.
 3) Generate questions and engage in discussion regarding the role of ethics in scientific research and in
 decision making based on scientific information.
 4) Make observations and ask questions about the natural world. Refine the questions such that they
 can be answered by way of scientific investigation.
 5) Use online search engines to find sources of scientific information. Develop, share, and revise
 criteria for evaluating reliability of sources.
 6) Obtain and communicate information regarding ethical research practices pertaining to humans and
 animals as well as information regarding proper permitting agencies and procedures.
 7) Obtain and present information on research protocols including citation formats (APA, MLA, etc.),
 plagiarism, and copyright and patent laws.
 8) Engage in the peer review process by giving and receiving detailed feedback throughout the process
 of planning and carrying out investigations.
                                                                                                      124


9) Develop a research proposal including the following: a problem statement; purpose of research;
significance of research; objectives; literature review (including both primary and secondary sources);
materials and methods; detailed budget; data analysis procedures; and, references. Include a list of
potential risks associated with the study and a detailed safety plan as appropriate for materials and
methods. Revise the proposal based on feedback from teacher and peers.
10) Create a scientific journal and/or lab notebook for recording qualitative and quantitative data.
11) Carry out an original scientific investigation (experiment or study) after having received approval of
a revised research proposal.
12) Select and use appropriate statistical procedures (descriptive statistics, t-tests, regression and
correlation, chi-square, etc.) to analyze data. Use available calculators, spreadsheets, and statistical
software programs.
13) Select and use appropriate data tables, graphs, and diagrams to represent data. Use mathematic
and computational thinking to look for patterns in data.
14) Develop a conclusion based on data analysis and cite evidence to support the conclusion.
15) Use data to develop a model. Evaluate the effectiveness of the model by making and testing
predictions.
16) Evaluate experimental results and identify possible sources of error or bias in scientific
investigations (published research, original research, and research of peers).
17) Write a scientific paper based on original scientific research including the following or equivalent
sections: abstract, introduction, literature review, materials and methods, results, conclusions, and
literature cited.
18) Prepare and give a presentation based on original scientific research.
19) Prepare a poster based on original scientific research and participate in a poster session.
20) Submit research to scientific agencies as appropriate.
                                                                                                         125


GUIDING DOCUMENTS
•  National Research Council. (2012). A Framework for K-12 Science Education: Practices, Crosscutting
   Concepts, and Core Ideas. Washington, DC: The National Academies Press.
   http://www.nap.edu/catalog.php?record_id=13165#
State Standards Used in the Development and Writing
•  California. Science Content Standards for California Public Schools Kindergarten through Grade
   Twelve. (1998).
   http://www.cde.ca.gov/be/st/ss/documents/sciencestnd.pdf
•  Indiana. Indiana Academic Standards. (2012).
   http://www.doe.in.gov/standards/science
•  Louisiana. Academic Standards and Grade Level Expectations. (Retrieved July, 2014).
   https://www.louisianabelieves.com/resources/library/academic-standards
•  Massachusetts. Curriculum Framework. (2006 & 2013). Science and Technology/ Engineering
   http://www.doe.mass.edu/frameworks/scitech/1006.pdf
•  Michigan. Course/Credit Content Expectations. (Retrieved July, 2014).
   http://www.michigan.gov/mde/0,4615,7-140-38924_41644_42814---,00.html
•  Ohio. Ohio’s New Learning Standards. (2013).
   http://education.ohio.gov/Topics/Ohio-s-New-Learning-Standards/Science
•  South Carolina. Science Standards. (2014).
   http://ed.sc.gov/agency/se/Instructional-Practices-and-Evaluations/Science.cfm
•  Virginia. Science Standards of Learning. (2003).
   http://www.doe.virginia.gov/testing/sol/standards_docs/science/2003/index.shtml
•  Washington DC. DC Educational Standards. (2010-2014, various. Retrieved July, 2014).
   http://osse.dc.gov/service/dc-educational-standards
Other Resources
•  Anderson, L. W., Krathwohl, D. R., & Airasian, P. W. (2001). A taxonomy for learning, teaching, and
   assessing: A revision of Bloom's taxonomy of educational objectives. New York, NY: Longman.
•  Chumney, K. (Retrieved July, 2014). Oakland Schools Chemistry Resource Unit.
   https://www.oakland.k12.mi.us/Portals/0/Learning/ElectronsQuantumMechanics.pdf
                                                                                                     126


• The College Board. (Retrieved July, 2014). AP Course Overviews.
  https://apstudent.collegeboard.org/apcourse/
• Exploring Earth Online Interactive (Unit 1, Chapter 1, How are Earth’s Sphere’s Interacting) Retrieved
  July, 2014.
  http://www.classzone.com/books/earth_science/terc/navigation/chapter01.cfm
• Lerner, L. S., Goodenough, U., Lynch, J., Schwartz, M., & Schwartz, R. (2012). The State of State
  Science Standards, 2012. Thomas B. Fordham Institute.
  http://edexcellence.net/publications/the-state-of-state-science-standards-2012.html
• National Research Council. (2013). Next Generation Science Standards: For States, By States.
  Washington, DC: The National Academies Press.
  http://www.nextgenscience.org/
• Young, A.G. (2012, November). Going Beyond Verbs to Cognitive Complexity. Handout: Cognitive
  Rigor Matrix. Presented at the 10th Annual South Carolina Formative Assessment Conference,
  Myrtle Beach, SC. South Carolina Formative Assessment Conference.
  http://scformativeassessment.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/06/Cognitive-Rigor-Matrix.pdf
• Tisko, E. (Retrieved July, 2014). AP Chemistry
  Notes. http://www.unomaha.edu/tiskochem/APChem/
                                                                                                     127
